The recently published conjecture that such lesions of the retroperitoneum represent a separate entity with features of a malignant neoplasm is discussed.
An example of a plexiform fibrohistiocytic tumour (PFT) is presented for the first time in the German-language literature.
The diagnostic criteria for this rare soft-tissue neoplasm of childhood and young adulthood, which is mostly subcutaneous in location and has a tendency to recur, include the plexiform structure which gives it its name, extensive siderin deposits and numerous osteoclast-like giant cells.
The development of the tumour described here, which occurred in the field of radiation of a malignant haemangiopericytoma excised 7 years previously, indicates the possibility of induction of PFT by radiation.
The current increase in the cost of health care must be considered as a severe threat to the prehospital emergency services system.
Two examples have been selected - the patient with polytrauma and the patient in cardiac arrest - to demonstrate the dilemma between a need for objective data and the requirements of emergency patients.
Study results obtained in trauma patients indicating that total prehospital time, including scene time, is correlated to patient outcome have led to the conclusion that at the scene treatment by emergency physicians may be dispensable.
It has, however also been demonstrated that the time required for medical treatment at the scene is equivalent to 20% of the total scene time, thus representing only a fraction of the total prehospital time.
Correlating the total prehospital time or scene time to outcome therefore appears absurd.
The treatment principle of aggressive shock treatment in polytrauma needs critical reevaluation on the basis of results obtained by recent preclinical studies in patients with penetrating torso injuries.
Small volume resuscitation could not be demonstrated to improve outcome in polytrauma patients, although a slight improvement in patients with brain injury may be assumed.
Endotracheal intubation and early artificial ventilation are proven therapeutic principles in polytraumatized patients.
Unfortunately, for ethical reasons randomised carefully controlled comparative studies can not be performed in polytrauma patients unless the patient is fully conscious.
The importance of endotracheal intubation and artificial ventilation in unconscious trauma patients becomes apparent under conditions of anaesthesia where the application of the endotracheal tube averts regurgitation, aspiration and concomitant morbidity and mortality.
The common causes of cardiovascular collapse and their pathomechanisms, as well as the mechanisms of cardiopulmonary resuscitation, have been widely investigated.
Nevertheless, various aspects of their application are still controversial.
The most recent study results have recommended initial ventilation prior to thoracic compression.
New methods of assisting mechanical cardiopulmonary resuscitation, such as ACD CPR or vest CPR, have shown promising results in animal experiments.
However, the importance of results obtained by preclinical randomised controlled investigations in humans need to be confirmed by further studies as to outcome.
The efficacy of defibrillation in cases of ventricular fibrillation has been clearly demonstrated, particularly with a view to the interval between ventricular fibrillation and defibrillation.
It has further been demonstrated that basic cardiopulmonary resuscitation preserves ventricular fibrillation and thus improves the chance of survival.
The present generation of defibrillators has been further improved, particularly by the introduction of biphasic defibrillator wave forms, which may reduce the required energy, as well as possible complications, while offering an increase in the efficacy of defibrillation and a reduction in defibrillator size.
Scientific emergency medicine is responsible not only for the development and validation of new methods and concepts, but in particular for their application under quality control conditions.
Politicians require an improvement in the quality of the validation of emergency measures, although the instruments available for the investigation of these measures are known to be obsolete (experimental models, experimental design).
Additionally, the financial support of research in emergency medicine suffers from being accourded low priority by public research funds such as the German Research Fund.
However, in view of the rapid application of experimental results to daily practice it should be emphasized that patients also support research in emergency medicine via their direct financial contributions to the health insurance companies.
The prognosis in patients with gynecologic cancers depends not only on the stage but also on a wide spectrum of other findings.
Cross-sectional imaging modalities, including sonography, CT and MRI, have increasingly been used for optimal treatment planning in gynecologic cancers.
Their staging criteria are based on the well-established FIGO staging system.
CT and MRI compete with sonography, which plays a pivotal role in the evaluation of the female pelvis.
This paper reviews the role of sonography, CT and MRI in the staging of gynecologic malignancies.
It puts the emphasis on MRI, which has been established as imaging modality of choice in the preoperative evaluation of cervical and endometrial cancer, and which seems slightly superior to CT in the staging of ovarian cancer.
Extraabdominal desmoids represent one group of deep fibromatoses.
These aggressive nonmetastasizing tumorlike lesions have a strong tendency to local infiltration, with a recurrence rate of about 40 %.
Trauma, hormones and heredity have been implicated as etiologic factors.
Shoulder, chest wall, back and thigh are favored sites.
By combination of different diagnostic procedures the number of differential diagnoses can be reduced to only a few.
While in former times surgery was thought to be the only kind of therapy, nowadays adjuvant procedures like radiation, hormonal therapy and also chemotherapy are becoming more and more important.
Amputation or other mutilating procedures should be done only if the tumor recurs repeatedly.
Katayama syndrome is an allergic reaction of antigens of schistosomes, known as the acute phase of schistosomiasis.
We report on an eleven year-old boy, who was seen at our outpatient department because of cough and oedema of the face after travelling to Malawi.
Remarkable findings were an eosinophilia and antibodies against schistosoma-antigens.
Six weeks later the diagnosis was confirmed by detecting eggs of Schistosoma haematobium in the urine.
Parasitological examinations of urine and faeces four months later were negative.
There is still a significant lack of treatment and rehabilitation facilities for chronic pain patients in Germany today.
Most of all the treatment of low back pain and widespread pain syndromes or panalgesia is time consuming and complicated.
The main problem of anaesthesiological pain clinics is the increase of these complex pain syndromes in the last years.
The definition of chronic pain is a contiuous noxious input modulated and compounded by the prolonged or recurrent nature of chronic state and further complicated by a multitude of economic and psychosocial factors.
It is now clear that no one discipline or mode will suffice.
Only a multidisciplinary and intensive approache will prevail, as discussed in this article.
Unfortunately these multidisciplinary pain units are nearly not existing in Gemany just as little as control of the effectiveness of pain treatment.
The use of somato-sensory evoked potentials (SEP) in supraaortal reconstructions has been well accepted.
However, reports about incidence and clinical significance of ischaemic SEP alterations differ widely.
In a prospective study we registered SEP alterations during 482 operations done on 419 patients between 1 July 1994, and 31 December 1996.
Incidence, risk factors and clinical relevance were investigated.
In only 1.7% of cases SEP examination was inadequate.
During 406 operations SEP were altered minimally or not at all.
Significant changes were dedected during 65 interventions (13.5%).
The clinical outcome was poor when alteration was found during carotid dissection (five events, three deficits).
Cross-clamping ischaemia was the common reason for alterations (81.5%); they were generally reversible after shunting and without clinical significance.
As risk factor for cross-clamping ischaemia, only contralateral carotid occlusion was identified.
Tyrosine-rich crystalloids in tumors of the salivary glands are rare and have been reported mainly in specimens from Black African patients.
The pathogenesis of these structures is still unclear, but pathological secretion by neoplastic myoepithelial cells is supposed.
Millon's staining and ultrastructural examinations are used for confirming the diagnosis.
We present the case report of a 59-year-old woman with a myoepithelioma of the minor salivary glands in the smooth palate containing tyrosine-rich crystalloids as an example of this rare phenomenon.
Pseudoarthrosis and cubitus valgus as main complications following displaced fractures of the radial condyle in children can be prevented by open reduction and fixation by K wires.
However, delayed union and stimulation of the radial physis with condylar overgrowth and varisation of the elbow as well as fishtail deformities of the distal end of the humerus are reported nevertheless.
To prevent those growth disturbances all primary and secondary (4-day X-ray control) displaced fractures of the radial condyle, i. e. those with a central gap of more than 2 mm, were prospectively treated by open reduction and osteosynthesis with a metaphyseal lag screw beginning 1974.
Sixty-six patients (41 boys, 25 girls) with an average follow-up of 10 years (2-22 years) sustained 28 primary and 6 secondary displaced fractures.
In 5 cases a K wire fixation was performed in view of the smallness of the fragment.
Two children with conservative treatment following overlooked displaced fractures showed condylar overgrowth and varisation of the elbow.
Screw osteosynthesis led to symmetric elbow angles and function in all cases, whereas fishtail deformities could be observed in 8 of 27 children, probably as a consequence of the remaining central fracture instability.
Conclusion: Open reduction and osteosynthesis with a metaphyseal lag screw prevents condylar overgrowth in displaced fractures of the radial condyle by guaranteeing fracture healing in anatomic position within 3-4 weeks.
However, fishtail deformity can not be prevented by metaphyseal compression only.
A commercially available C1 inhibitor (C1-INH) concentrate was used for short-term prophylaxis before surgery in two patients with hereditary angioneurotic oedema.
The patients suffered from recurrent subcutaneous and submucosal oedema of the face, extremities, and gastrointestinal tract as the result of a hereditary C1-INH deficiency.
Both patients were receiving tranexamic acid or danazol therapy as oral long-term prophylaxis.
Over the years the patients underwent several operations in regional and general anaesthesia, with mask ventilation or intubation.
The C1-INH plasma concentrations measured preoperatively were always very low (0.02-0.06 g/l, normal range 0.15-0.35 g/l), despite the oral long-term prophylaxis.
Substitution treatment with 500-1000 U C1-INH was performed 1 h before surgery.
No side effects were seen following the concentrate infusions.
With this substitution treatment no specific symptoms of hereditary angioneurotic oedema were recognized in either case.
The measurement of C1-INH plasma concentration 2 h or 4 h after C1-INH substitution showed a marked rise in both patients, though normal values were not reached in either.
We suggest that infusion of C1 concentrate is an appropriate form of preoperative substitution treatment in patients with hereditary angioneurotic oedema, in view of the lower risk of infection than with infusion of fresh-frozen plasma and the observed effectiveness.
This case report describes a 62 years old patient who suffered from therapy resisten atrial fibrillation for 12 years.
She underwent "Cox/Maze-III-Procedure" during a mitral valve reconstruction and a stable sinus rhythm was achieved.
Two years after operation she has been in a stable sinus rhythm.
Transesophageal echocardiography revealed normal cardiac dimensions and function with coordinated atrioventricular contractility.
Therefore the therapy with anticoagulants and antiarrhythmics could be discontinued.
Two cases of congenital wandering spleen with typical clinical course are reported:  An 11-year old girl had a two month history of intermittent abdominal pain predominantly after physical stress.
In upright position a palpable resistance could be identified as wandering spleen by ultrasound and scintiscan, and in this case splenopexy was performed.
An otherwise healthy 3-year old girl suffered from acute abdomen caused by torsion of an upside- down spleen with partial infarction.
Diagnosis was made based on ultrasound and CT-Scan.
The extent of infarction could be evaluated by color flow sonography.
After partial resection splenopexy in orthotopic position was performed.
Discussion: In situations of intermittent abdominal pain as well as acute abdomen torsion of wandering spleen should be taken into consideration.
Monodisciplinary orthopaedic pain therapy no longer measures up to international standards.
In cases of chronic back pain, in particular, there is such a gulf between the clinical findings and the patient's subjective assessment that the symptoms cannot be attributed solely to so-called degenerative changes.
Back pain patients are in great danger of becoming fixated on somatic symptoms due to an excess of diagnostic procedures or incorrect diagnoses, of being treated purely somatically on the basis of associated findings, and of suffering irreversible damage from invasive management of such findings.
Despite the wealth of empirical evidence, it remains difficult to expand the everyday concept of illness and its causes to include not only physical and biological factors but also social and emotional disturbances.
Particularly physicians with a purely biological concept of pain have not learned to take note of affective relational factors and incorporate them into their diagnostic assessment.
The decision to undertake invasive diagnostic or therapeutic procedures then frequently represents the doctor's reaction to feelings of irritation or helplessness.
If this situation is to change, an interdisciplinary concept of pain must be made a part of medical training, and scientific findings must be presented in such a way that they can be integrated into routine daily practice.
The laboratory surveillance of measles in Germany contributes to an objective estimation of the situation.
Compared to data of the pre-vaccination era, the incidence of measles has been reduced, while a shift in age towards the group of 15-year-olds is observed.
Germany will have considerable difficulties to reach the aim of eradicating measles in the European region by the year 2007.
Apart from the fact that systematic surveillance is lacking, the immunity gaps in small children represent a particularly weak spot.
In order to effectively control measles, high vaccination rates of at least 90% are necessary by the end of the second year of life.
In addition, laboratory surveillance has to be included to measure successful vaccination.
Main focusses are the laboratory confirmation of suspected measles cases, seroprevalence studies of population immunity as well as the control of the circulation of measles viruses.
The Working Group Measles ("Arbeitsgemeinschaft Masern" - AGM) as well as the amended law on infection prevention are important instruments to make measurable progress towards measles eradication also in Germany.
We report on the activities of the National Reference Centre for Measles, Mumps and Rubella since 1991.
The German data are compared to those of selected other European countries.
The different methods that are available for the assessment and quantification of "brittle nails" and for the evaluation of various therapeutical approaches are compared.
At this time, measurement of the swelling properties is the best documented and most reliable method for studying the treatment of brittle nails.
Reliable qualitative data can also be obtained by scanning electron microscopy.
Measurement of the transonychial water loss and assessment of thickness and density of nails by ultrasound have also been used successfully, but the methodology still has to be improved and the reproducibility, confirmed.
The case of a closed elbow dislocation with complete rupture of the brachial artery and its veins is described.
This combination of injuries is rather rare and only 25 cases were found in the literature.
The sharp lesion of the vessels was remarkable, probably due to the edge of the distally ruptured capsule.
Immediate revision with suture of the vessels and an immobilization for three weeks gave a good result.
The management of multiple trauma patients has improved recently.
Surgeons' education, preclinical rescue structures, initial clinical survey and therapeutic strategies, as well as diagnostic imaging, have progressed.
Plain film imaging is increasingly being abandoned in favor of CT. Fast imaging techniques (spiral CT) have led to the inclusion of CT in the primary survey.
To minimize the risk to the patient during prolonged diagnostic time, algorithms have to be defined concerning structures, emergency room equipment and quality.
Basics, state of the art and suggestions concerning management of multiple trauma patients are presented and discussed from the radiologist's point of view.
The importance of hepatitis C virus infection has been recently noted in patients with hypertrophic cardiomyopathy or dilated cardiomyopathy.
In a collaborative research project of the Committees for the Study of Idiopathic Cardiomyopathy, hepatitis C virus antibody was found in 74 of 697 patients (10.65) with hypertrophic cardiomyopathy and in 42 of 663 patients (6.3%) with dilated cardiomyopathy; these prevalences were significantly higher than that found in volunteer blood donors in Japan.
Hepatitis C virus antibody was detected in 650 of 11,967 patients (5.4%) seeking care in 5 academic hospitals.
Various cardiac abnormalities were found, and arrhythmias were the most frequent.
These observations suggest that hepatitis C virus infection is an important cause of a variety of otherwise unexplained heart diseases.
Transdifferentiated retinal pigment epithelial cells (RPE) display enhanced contractile potentials and have been implicated in the development of tractional retinal detachment.
This study determines the activity of contraction-promoting factors, examines some involved mechanisms and evaluates inhibitors.
Using an in vitro contractionassay, we demonstrated that collagen matrix contraction by transdifferentiated RPE cells is effectively stimulated by serum, platelet-derived growth factor and insulin-like growth factor-1.
Endothelin-1 and transforming growth factor-1 and -2 have a more discrete or marginal effect.
Tractional forces promoted by these peptides are completely protein synthesis dependent.
Contraction stimulated by serum is only partly dependent on de novo protein synthesis, suggesting different active factors and/or pathways.
Staurosporine, a broad-spectrum kinase inhibitor, effectively inhibited collagen matrix contraction by transdifferentiated RPE cells regardless of the promoter.
Revascularization in cases of recurrent occlusions following aorto-iliac vascular reconstructions, particular in high-risk patients, poses a therapeutic dilemma.
We report the case of a 78-year-old female patient who presented - after multiple vascular reconstructions of iliac and femoral arteries - with Leriche syndrome, resulting critical limb ischemia and concomitant coronary and lung disease.
Due to the high surgical and anesthetic risk we implanted an axillo-bifemoral PTFE graft.
The preoperative angiography of the supraaortic branches revealed a high-grade stenosis of the right subclavian artery in the presence of a previously implanted carotid-subclavian bypass on the left.
This stenosis was dilated and then stented by way of the proximal end of the axillo-bifemoral graft, which in turn was distally anastomosed to the right popliteal and left deep femoral artery.
Postoperative angiography verified a good run-off and satisfactory vascular status was obtained.
Duplex sonography 6 months after surgery showed a good flow and the patient was free of symptoms.
These results demonstrate that, combined with intraoperative stent application, an axillo-bifemoral graft can be implanted with good results.
Objective: Concerning the long-term somatic development of children born with very low birth weight and/or born very premature, there are varying and sometimes contradictory statements.
A follow-up study was carried out on premature-born children from Thuringia and Saxonia at pre-school and early school age in order to investigate the long-term somatic development of these children.
Anthropological parameters were examined and compared with the data of a reference group.
Mediastinitis caused by infection with Clostridium perfringens and spontaneous rupture of the esophagus are both life threatening conditions.
The combination of these two entities led to septic multiorgan failure in a 38-year-old woman.
The patient was treated successfully by esophagectomy and postoperative lavage through a partially open abdomen.
The lack of information regarding emesis, the leading symptom of Boerhaave's syndrome, caused delayed diagnosis: the triad of emesis, severe epigastric pain and emphysema of the skin was not established until 30 h after the onset of symptoms.
For ethical and socio-economical reasons (cost-explosion in transfusion-medicine, patient's individual destiny), devepolment and consistent application of allogeneic transfusion sparing techniques in surgery is a chal- lenge to anesthesiologists, surgeons and blood-bankers.
The combination of different techniques, i.e.
autologous predonation, hemodilution, choice of anesthetic regimen, deliberate hypotension, application of anti-fibrinolytic agents and autotransfusion of intraoperatively saved blood allow for avoidance of allogeneic blood transfusion even in patients presenting important intraoperative hemorrhage.
Introduction: If the surgeon cannot find the tendon of the superior oblique muscle in the right place, he has to change his operative plans intraoperatively.
Different procedures are recommended: reinsertion of the superior oblique in the right place, recession of the inferior oblique muscle, and operations on the vertical muscles of the same or the yoke eye.
No quantitative recommendations on the surgical amount are mentioned in the literature.
In 180 children (87 children belonging to a control group, 68 with fever of non-renal origin, and 25 with pyelonephritis) albumin and immunoglobulin G (markers for glomerular dysfunction), -1-microglobulin and  -NAG (markers for proximal tubular dysfunction) and apolipoprotein A1 (marker of 'postrenal' dysfunction) were measured in second-voided morning urine.
In children with fever of non-renal origin, glomerular dysfunction was encountered in 8.8 %, tubular dysfunction in 17.6 % and mixed glomerular-tubular dysfunction in 14.7 % of cases.
Among children with pyelonephritis, 28 % revealed glomerular dysfunction and 44 % mixed glomerular-tubular dysfunction.
No case of solitary proximal tubular dysfunction was observed in children with pyelonephritis.
There were highly significant differences in presence and expression of glomerular dysfunction between children with fever of non-renal origin and children with pyelonephritis (P < 0.0001), whereas with regard to proximal tubular dysfunction, the differences were only moderately significant ( -NAG: P < 0.01) or of low significance (-1-microglobulin: P < 0.05).
This may indicate that morphologic changes occur during interstitial pyelonephritis due to inflammation of glomeruli, resulting in glomerular dysfunction, while proximal tubular dysfunction may additionally be due to fever-associated function processes.
Up to the middle of the 1970s, chemotherapy had only a marginal role in the overall treatment concept for cervical carcinoma, and surgery and radiotherapy are still the cornerstones of treatment today.
There are indications for chemotherapy, which can theoretically be used as follows:
We compared a cw carbon dioxide flash-scanning laser system to an Er:YAG laser in laser skin resurfacing of facial rhytides.
In all patients, CO2 laser treatment showed a better cosmetic result whereas erythema and postinflammatory hyperpigmentation were less marked in Er:YAG laser therapy.
A separation of the individual latex layers is a known complication of endotracheal armoured tubes manufactured by immersion technique.
This can result in herniation into the lumen with obstruction of the tube.
Diffusion of nitrous oxide into the inner hernia considerably intensifies the obstruction.
This can lead to life-threatening situations.
We observed a similar herniation caused by layer separation with subsequent tube obstruction of silicolatex anaesthesia tubes used in paediatric circuit systems.
This is caused by manufacturing defects and above all by damage incurred in reprocessing.
Therefore it is important to process the tubes carefully.
A too-high drying temperature can cause premature layer separation.
The tubes should never be processed more than 80 times.
Routine examination of the tubes is imperative, especially at the predilection sites for layer separation.
Severe aortic valve disease is a rare complication of coarctation in adults.
Between 1961 and 1990 aortic valve replacement was performed after or combined with the operation of coarctation in 24 adults (4% of entire population operated for coarctation).
Bicuspid aortic valves were present in 2/3 of patients.
In 10 patients (710 with aortic stenosis) coarctation was operated early (mean age 24 years) and aortic valve late (mean age 40 years): in 14 (1014 with aortic regurgitation, mean age 40 years) aortic valve and coarctation were operated simultaneously (8 patients) or staged within 6 months (6 patients).
Additional surgical interventions on the dilated aorta ascendens were performed in 8, mitral valve replacement in 2 and aorto-coronary bypass in 1 patients.
Early mortality was 224 (8%) and was similar in simultaneously (18) and staged (114) operated cases: 10 year survival was lower than in an age-matched group of 72 patients with aortic valve disease of similar severity operated during the same period (70% vs 88%, p < 0.01): 67 late deaths were cardia; 55 pts with preoperatively severely increased end-diastolic (> 199 mlm2) and 44 with end-systolic (> 90 mlm2) left ventricular volumes and 22 with ejection fraction < 41 % died late postoperatively.
Abstract  13 experienced addiction therapists provid-ed information about trauma experiences and comorbidity of 122 clients (26 women and 96 men) with opiate addiction and multiple substance abuse.
42% had had at least one traumatic life experience and the women had higher percentages than men.
The victimization primarely took place during childhood and prior to the begin of drug consumption.
26% of the trauma victims were diagnosed as having post-traumatic stress disorder.
In comparison with individuals without trauma experiences, victims evidenced significantly more comorbid symptoms, they more frequently suffered from polytoxicomania and had more experiences with psychotherapy.
Nearly all drugs currently used during the course of general anaesthesia may lead to hypersensitivity reactions of various types.
There may be an acute type I allergic reactions or to a more or less severe pseudoallergic reactions, in rare cases with lethal outcome.
Routine preoperative testing appears of little predictive value, in spite of the high frequency of so-called risk factors (atopy, other kind of allergy) among the evaluated group of patients.
Careful allergological testing should be performed 4 to 6 weeks after any incidents of suspected drug intolerance, in order to discover the underlying causative agent.
Skin testing is of diagnostic value for neuromuscular blockers and intravenous narcotics.
RAST- and RIA-tests and/or mediator releasing tests may also used additionally.
Together with all other administered drugs, all the routinely used neuromuscular blockers (suxamethonium, vecuronium, pancuronium, alcuronium, atracurium, mivacurium) should be tested, since they often represent the cause for such reactions.
For other classes of drugs (for example, volatile anesthetics and opioids) the clinical relevance of skin testing still remains uncertain.
For less severe incidents seen during general anaesthesia such as pruritus, or exanthems, skin testing seems to be less relevant.
Nociception is a protective system of the body which prevents it from injury and tissue damage.
Human beings respond to noxious stimuli by moving away.
They learn by pain to avoid these situations in future.
Shortly after major injury, there is a limited analgesic period allowing the body to flee the area of danger, later on, emerging pain compels the body to rest and supports recuperation.
While acute pain has a certain meaning, chronic pain does not.
It induces a comprehensive suffering including loss of initiative, appetite and vigilance.
It reduces life-quality, often accompanied by depressive moods.
Acute pain causes changes in the central nervous system leading to an increased sensitivity of nociception (hyperalgesia).
During healing, the central processing of noxious stimuli is normalised taking minutes to weeks.
Sometimes, unknown factors initiate chronification of pain.
Changes on a molecular level in peripheral tissue as well as in the central nervous system induce "cellular early genes" [24], a synthesis of c-fos, c-jun and other proteins favouring the chronification of pain.
All efforts have to be made to depress or interrupt such a development.
One of the first steps to pain prophylaxis in a hospital is an optimal surgical technique: incision, extension, limited tissue damage and minimal invasive surgery should guarantee the smallest impairment of the nociceptive system possible.
However, nociceptive input is intense and of long duration and leads to central sensibilisation.
Postoperative pain has lost its function as surgery anticipates healing.
Pain induces a reduction of ventilation, circulation, digestion and increases the risk of other disorders.
There is need of aggressive pain treatment for humanitarian reasons and for reasons of late sequelae like permanent pain and increased reduction of function [10].
This is of pivotal importance in patients with amputations or sympathetic reflex dystrophy (SRD).
Antinociception is best provided by regional anaesthesia technique with a combination of local anaesthetics and opioids which results in better outcome [2, 12].
Hence, regional anaesthesia techniques are strongly indicated in those patients.
Good antinociception may be even more important than it is assumed today.
Anand [1] demonstrated a lower morbidity and mortality in 45 newborns undergoing cardiothoracic surgery, when general anaesthesia was performed with high-dose sufentanil versus halothane supplementary doses of morphine.
Anaesthesiologists have to reconsider the quality of general anaesthesia: the antinociception of their regimen.
In diagnostics of erectile dysfunction there are different simple or large-scale procedures available.
Refering to a three-step-scheme that makes difference in the diagnostics in I. non-invasive, II.
invasive procedures the current diagnostic measures will be explained.
To the non-invasive measures do account the extensive patients history taking including the sexual history and the psychological diagnostics, the physical examination and laboratory screenings.
The semi-invasive procedures include the intracavernous injection test with vasoactice substances, the doppler sonography and duplex or color duplex sonography, the corpus-cavernosum-electromyogram (CC-EMG) and other neurophysiological examinations.
The third invasive step contains the dynamic infusion pharmacological cavernosography and cavernosometry (DICC) and the selective pharmacological phallo-arteriography.
The procedures of this step are essentially limited to patients with erectile dysfunction who are planned for surgical interventions.
Technological advances in the last two years in mammalian nuclear transfer techniques and the establishment of human embryonic stem cell lines formed the background of the International Workshop on "Embryonic Stem Cells and Nuclear Transfer Strategies" organized at the Gene Center, Munich, September 1999.
The aim of the meeting was to bring together scientists working in the stem cell field and those working on somatic nuclear transfer techniques to discuss the present status and prospects of both technologies for basic and applied research and future use in medicine and livestock breeding.
"Biology of Embryonic Stem Cells", "Nuclear Transfer Strategies", and "Stem Cell Differentiation - Cell Therapy" were the main topics of the meeting.
It became clear that we are far from understanding the processes involved in stem cell self-renewal and differentiation and the mechanisms resulting in reprogramming of nuclei from somatic cells after transfer into enucleated oocytes.
However, data were presented that showed the enormous potential of the embryonic stem cell technology for tissue transplantation in the future.
Before any use of this technology in combination with any cloning technology for human cell therapy will be possible, further research including animal models and stem cell differentiation approaches in culture (i. e., identification of differentiation factors, selective differentiation strategies, reporter gene assays) is necessary to understand the basic principles of pluripotent stem cell differentiation and the mechanisms involved in reprogramming somatic cell nuclei.
Certain fractures and/or dislocations of the femoral head are known to cause arterial injury and result in post-traumatic osteonecrosis.
However, the more complex etiology of non-traumatic osteonecrosis is multifactorial and includes chemotherapy, radiotherapy, thermal injuries, and especially coagulopathies, which are now commonly observed in these patients.
Intravascular coagulation with fibrin thrombosis begins in the capillaries and sinusoids of the intraosseous microcirculation, and residual venous thrombosis is more likely to occur if there is coexistent hypofibrinolysis.
The aim of our study was to investigate the influence that serum of patients with preeclampsia has on t-PA and PAI-1 expression from human endothelial cells.
For this purpose, we cultured human endothelium cells, gained from umbilical veins, for 24 h with sera of 7 patients with HELLP syndrome and 12 patients with preeclampsia.
The sera of 12 normotensive pregnant patients and 9 non-pregnant women were used as controls.
We then determined t-PA and PAI-1 levels by ELISA, both in the maternal serum and in the supernatant of the endothelial cell cultures.
While t-PA levels were significantly higher in the serum of patients with preeclampsia and HELLP syndrome than in the control group (median: 8.0 ng/ml and 6.2 ng/ml vs 3.9 ng/ml and 3.1 ng/ml), levels of PAI-1 did not show any significant disparity among the different groups.
The supernatant of the endothelial cell cultures demonstrated significantly elevated levels of both t-PA (P<0.001) and PAI-1 (P<0.01) when stimulated with serum gained from patients with preeclampsia or HELLP syndrome.
The increased expression of t-PA and PAI-1 from human endothelium cells after stimulation with the serum of preeclamptic patients must be considered as a sign of increased endothelial cell activation.
Postoperative pain relief can be achieved by several methods, including the use of systemic opioids and regional anaesthesia with intrathecal or epidural opioids or local anaesthetics.
On-demand analgesia using a PCA (patient-controlled analgesia) system is regarded as the ideal option for systemic opioid analgesia.
While PCA devices are not yet commonly used in all recovery units, the use of repetitive boluses on demand is still the most frequent form of administration in postoperative pain therapy.
The objective of the present study was to show if continuous infusion of the opioid tramadol could produce better analgesia than repetitive administration of boluses.
In a study under double-blind conditions 135 ASA I and II patients were assigned at random to group I (infusion group) or group B (bolus group) when they first requested pain treatment after abdominal surgery.
The patients in group I received an initial intravenous loading dose of 100 mg tramadol, followed by an infusion of 12 mg/h tramadol for 24 h; if necessary, repeated boluses of 50 mg tramadol were given.
In group B the patients received a placebo infusion instead of the tramadol infusion; otherwise, the procedure was the same.
Pain relief was monitored by means of a VAS (visual analogue scale) up to 6 h after surgery.
We investigated the retrograde assessment of analgesia by the patients after 6 h, how often repetitive boluses were required, and the amount of analgesics administered in 6 and 24 h. Results.
The pain relief was assessed as excellent or good by 76.5% of group I and 65.6% of group B; 19.1% of group I and 26.9% of group B assessed the analgesic effect as satisfactory; 4.4% of group I and 7.5% of group B complained of insufficient analgesia.
In group I 69.2% requested only one or no repetitive bolus, compared with 40.3% in group B, while two or more boluses were demanded by 30.8% in group I and 59.7% in group B.
The average analgesic consumption after 6 h was 223.5 +/- 53.7 mg tramadol in group I and 176.6 +/- 63.1 mg tramadol in group B, respectively.
After 24 h it was 449.5 +/- 66.0 mg tramadol in group I and 201.6 +/- 83.9 mg tramadol in group B.
While the consumption during the first 6 h was comparable, from then on the consumption in group I increased significantly.
Side effects were reported by 25% in both groups.
They were clinically irrelevant and did not necessitate termination of the clinical trial in any case.
During the study period pulse and blood pressure remained within the normal range and did not show any significant changes.
The fact that the patients in group I requested far fewer repetitive boluses than those in group B and the assessment by the patients led to the conclusion that treatment in the infusion group is better than that in the bolus group.
Concerns that a significantly higher consumption of analgesics would cause unwanted side-effects have proven unfounded.
Six hours after surgery, when analgesia was evaluated by the patients, there was no significant difference between the two groups.
Not until the maintenance infusion had been administered for a further 18 h, was the tramadol consumption within the infusion group significantly higher.
Thus, we should consider continuing unreduced administration of the maintenance infusion 6 h after operation.
The concept of tuberculid was introduced by Darier in 1896.
In contrast to "true" cutaneous tuberculosis, properties of the tuberculids were explained by an hyperergic response to myobacteria or their fragments released from a different site of manifest or passed tuberculous infection.
Key features include a strongly positive tuberculin skin test, evidence of concomitant manifest or past tuberculosis, and prompt response to antituberculous therapy The inability to culture M. tuberculosis or to demonstrate it microscopically from lesional biopsies, together with reports on tuberculid-like eruptions after BCG vaccination, supports this concept.
Clinical manifestations are lichen scrophulosorum, papulo-necrotic tuberculids and erythema induratum of Bazin.
The existence of tuberculids has been questioned, however, because the clinical and histological appearances are not always specific.
An increasing number of case reports on tuberculids, new immunological tests and molecular biology-based techniques for the detection of mycobacteria have shed new light on the tuberculid concept.
Case Report: A 20-year-old female patient was admitted to the hospital because of a pneumothorax.
A secondary amenorrhea was coexisting.
On the abdominal wall and in the anogenital area a maculopapular exanthema was visible.
Chest X-ray and HR-CT showed a interstitial lung disease with high probability of histiocytosis X which was confirmed by biopsies of lung and skin tissue.
The cause of amenorrhea was a histiocytic infiltration of the pituitary stalk.
Conventional "consensus-treatment" for adults with vinblastine, prednisone and etoposide did not prevent relapsing bilateral pneumothoraces.
Treatment was successful with the protocol as proposed by the international study for children.
This treatment is characterized by higher dosage and combination with 6-mercaptopurine.
The prognosis of patients with malignant diseases requiring treatment on intensive care units is poor.
The hospital mortality for mechanically ventilated patients ranges from 70-90% in patients with solid tumors to 75-90% in patients with hematological malignancy and up to 95% in patients after bone marrow transplantation.
The number of patients referred to intensive care units is however increasing, due to improvements in the general treatment of malignant diseases.
This results in controversies about the utilization of intensive care treatment in these patients.
Since the individual outcome can not be predicted prior to initiation of intensive care therapy a general refusal of intensive care treatment seems not justified.
A reevaluation of the patients status after initiation of intensive care treatment based on predefined criteria may however be useful in the decision about continuing intensive care measures.
Patients requiring mechanical ventilation after bone marrow transplantation will not survive if prolonged treatment with vasopressors is necessary and/or sustained hepatic and renal failure is present.
For these patients a withdrawal of further life support may be considered.
Intensive care treatment should be continued in patients not fulfilling these criteria and treatment results are comparable to those in patients without malignant diseases.
For other patients with malignant diseases the use of a new score system developed for patients with cancer can be helpful in the clinical decision making.
On the basis of a solution-oriented marital therapy, the different within-session effects of four different types of questions in systemic therapy (lineal, strategic, circular, and reflexive), as described by Tomm (1989), were tested.
In this single case study, the method of plan analysis (Caspar 1989) was used to categorize the client's reactions to the four types of therapeutic questions.
Lineal and strategic questions were expected to have a stabilizing and restraining effect on the system (i.e.
the client, the clients' interaction, and the therapeutic interaction), whereas circular and reflexive questions were expected to open the system for change.
Interestingly this hypothesis was only supported for the wife, who had the role of the identified client in the therapy and demonstrated a much stronger motivation for change.
For the husband, who preferred the role of a cotherapist and demonstrated only little motivation for change, results were not as predicted.
Some of his reactions were even opposite to the expected therapeutic effects.
Therefore, it is suggested that an interaction effect between questions and the motivation for change can be assumed.
Prerequisites for experimental study designs are extremely difficult to realise under prehospital emergency conditions.
Results obtained in animal experiments always need validation with prehospital or inhospital patient studies.
Investigations related to emergency medicine are, however, an ethical obligation on behalf of the patient.
A retrospective analysis of the available literature should be considered a prerequisite for prospective randomised and controlled studies.
Frequently, a pilot study or feasibility trial needs to precede the actual study.
Informed consent must be obtained for all patient studies.
However, under emergency conditions informed consent cannot always be obtained due to unconsciousness, etc.
Nevertheless, the following principles should be observed: (a) randomised studies are essential, even in emergency medicine; (b) they are ethically acceptable if the treatment provided for the study group is at least equivalent to the therapy for the control group; ( c) only these preconditions guarantee that the patient always receives treatment in accordance with the standard of treatment.
If the patient is unconscious or otherwise unable to give informed consent, the principle of deferred consent is acceptable.
The deferred consent principle should be carefully documented.
A prospective randomized study represents the gold standard for an investigation, even under emergency conditions.
There are different principles of randomization: telephone or telefax randomisation, etc.
Emergency medicine investigations need to be completed within a reasonable time frame which should, as a rule, not exceed 2 years.
Otherwise, too many items might change without being noted.
Curative treatment and the intention to treat are terms employed by ethics committees.
If an investigation does not bear in itself additional risk factors, it does not necessarily have to be brought before the ethics committee.
If, however, for example, the effect of obtaining blood samples is investigated separately for research purposes, the patient needs to be informed and sign the respective agreement.
In Germany the ethics committees have agreed to accept their respective decisions.
For multicentre and multinational studies, however, the ethics committees also need to accept decisions made by non-German ethics committees.
Not all therapeutic principles can serve as the basis of prospective randomized studies because they need to be considered the present standard of care (e.g., endotracheal intubation, etc.).
Nevertheless, the feasibility of a study should be assessed according to the 1-3 rating proposed by the American Heart Association.
In principle, the overall emergency physician protocol does not fulfill scientific requirements.
For all studies, particularly in the prehospital setting, an independent observer should be involved for documentation purposes.
Scores can be of importance for investigating different treatment regimens.
Biases in emergency medicine studies focus on the variability of EMS, personnel qualifications, etc.
This is in part why it is extremely difficult to prove efficacy and efficiency in emergency medicine.
The results of emergency medicine investigations should be published in suitable journals, i.e., journals with a reasonable rating.
New antifungals for oral therapy have improved the chances of healing onychomycoses.
Nevertheless, in daily practice the failure rate is 20-30% both with itraconazole and terbinafine.
In our investigations for the fungicidal effects of terbinafine, we could show that the same strain of Trichophyton rubrum or T. mentagrophytes in the rest period needs 1000 times higher concentration of terbinafine (2,0 to 0,002 µg/ml) for complete fungal killing as in the growth phase.
Thus resting fungi in the nail are not harmed, and if the concentration of terbinafine is lower than the MIC for the fungi, they can cause a relapse.
Itraconazole is a fungistatic agent.
Its concentration in the nail plate must be higher than the MIC for the causative fungi for a long time - 10 to 12 months.
The usual short-term treatment of onychomycosis over 3 months can be insufficient in individual cases such as patients with disorders, e.g.
circulatory disorders or slowed nail growth.
This paper presents an algorithm for automatic switching between atrial tracking and nontracking pacing mode based on a "4 out of 7" concept: if 4 out of 7 atrial intervals are sensed below a critical value, mode switching (MS) is automatically performed.
The technical solution in Medtronic Kappa 700 dual chamber devices is explained together with an evaluation of advantages and possible limitations.
The "4 out of 7" algorithm offers a quick MS; by the addition of a "blanked flutter search" algorithm integrated into this concept, the detection of atrial flutter is facilitated in a wider range of programmed AV intervals.
With the increased rapidity of MS and sensitivity towards atrial flutter detection, there is also an increased propensity to switch to the nontracking mode in case of short atrial runs and frequent premature atrial beats.
Therefore, to optimize the MS function, programming of the device (e.g., activation of a time delay before MS) should be carried out individually with respect to the intrinsic rhythm and arrhythmia of the patient.
Possible interactions between different programmable parameters should also be taken into consideration.
Some guidelines are presented in this paper.
Finally, the use of extended stored diagnostic data seems to be crucial to evaluate pacemaker performance, incidence of atrial arrhythmias, and (as far as possible) confirmation of the stored data themselves by assessment of stored intracardiac electrograms.
Between 1983 and 1991 ten patients with chronic frontal sinus disease underwent frontal osteoplastic flaps with fat obliteration.
In order to judge operative success on a long-term basis all patients were called for postoperative follow-up.
They then completed a questionaire, in which they were asked about postoperative complaints.
Additionally, sinuses were examined by computed tomographic (CT) and magnetic resonance imaging (MR).
Among the patients evaluated seven had no complaints, and no evidence of disease could be found by medical examination.
CT scans showed complete obliteration of the frontal sinuses in all patients.
In these patients, two-thirds of the fat had been replaced by connective tissue.
MR was used in an attempt to show evidence for suppurative disease in the frontal sinus, but the MR images failed to correlate with symptoms.
Additional results could not be obtained when compared to CT.
Overall operating success could only be determined by clinical assessment and confirmed the value of the frontal osteoplastic flap with fat obliteration.
The objective of our trial was to evaluate the significance and usefulness of sentinel lymphadenectomy (SLNE) for the staging of regional lymph nodes in breast cancer patients.
The study presented illustrates the method and our results.
As has been documentated for melanoma, the first lymph node [sentinel node (SLN)] to receive lymphatic drainage from a primary tumor is the expected first site of lymph-node metastasis.
The database presented includes 12 patients with operable breast cancer and clinically negative lymph nodes.
In 11 cases the described method was applicable.
In only one case was there no correlation between the histology of the SLN and the axillary specimen.
Successful completion of examination of a large number of patients with a long follow-up has the potential of reducing the number of axillary dissections and of significantly reducing morbidity in the majority of breast cancer patients.
Background: Information on the extent and degree of the thermal effect produced is of great importance for control of the laser dosage in laser thermokeratoplasty (LTK) and for postoperative follow-up.
We investigated on acute LTK effects which information images obtained by optical low coherence tomography (OCT) offer compared to those obtained by polarization microscopy.
In cases with protected left main stenosis by previous bypass surgery or as an emergency intervention in patients presenting with acute myocardial infarction and cardiogenic shock, percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty is performed as an alternative treatment strategy to bypass surgery.
A review of 262 left main angioplasties revealed a procedure-related mortality in cases without protection of the left main coronary artery of 9.1% (4/44), in cases with partially protected left main stenosis by collaterals to either left coronary artery of 4.8% (1/21) and 0.5% (1/187) in cases with nonobstructed bypass grafts to either left coronary artery.
Coronary angioplasty of an unprotected left main coronary artery, had an unacceptably high procedure-related mortality rate and should therefore not be performed even in cases of emergency intervention.
The risk stratification of the procedure can be evaluated by the proposed grading of left main artery protection.
Hypocalcemia is a relatively uncommon reversible cause of congestive heart failure.
There are a few reports of hypocalcemic children who developed congestive heart failure associated with hypoparathyroidism.
In all these patients, however, cardiac failure did not occur before the age of nine years.
In addition, other striking noncardial manifestations of hypoparathyroidism, e.g., convulsive seizures, had been present prior to cardiac symptoms.
In this publication, Nager syndrome was analyzed in the literature and six patients from our clinic were evaluated in relation to symptoms, etiology and pathogenesis.
The diseases to be considered when making a differential diagnostis are pointed out.
Clarification of the etiology is still pending.
Molecular genetic research in these patients is possibly the key for new findings.
A case report illustrates the results of interdisciplinary treatment by the surgeon and orthodontist.
Possibilities and problems in relation to therapy are demonstrated.
The results of ankle arthroplasty have generally been disappointing compared to other forms of arthroplasty.
The present survey of results of ankle arthroplasty deals with the anatomical, the kinemasiological the biomechanical and the biological features of the ankle joint.
These features all seem important prerequisites for a successful total ankle prosthesis design.
From the study of the results displayed in the literature and those of my own series it can be stated that a modern ankle arthroplasty should respect the normal anatomy and kinemasiology.
Biomechanically it should work as a normal ankle joint i. e. cylindrical mobility, congruency and a possibility for normal torque within the ankle mortise.
The prosthesis components should only be fixed in solid subchondral bone, and preferably without cement.
Only compressible forces should act at the bone-prosthesis interface.
The axis of the ankle joint as well as of that of the hindfoot should be aligned to normal.
Meticulous surgery and special guide instruments are absolute necessities.
Restoration of muscle power and gait postoperatively are essential for a good and lasting result.
The indication for ankle arthroplasty is mainly cases of osteoarthritis (primary or traumatic) and rheumatoid arthritis.
Contraindications are talus necrosis, Charcot joints, extreme osteoporosis, severe arteriosclerosis, and very aggressive arthritis.
Mental disorders and neurological disorders may also be contraindications.
Furthermore, the patients should agree not to perform sports involving jumping and running or other ankle demanding activities.
The average annual failure rate should not exceed 1 % if these recommendations are followed.
Elbow flexion plays a key role in the overall function of the upper extremity.
In the case of unilateral complete brachial plexus lesion, restoration of elbow flexion will dramatically increase the patient's chances of regaining bimanual prehension.
Furthermore, depending on the type of reconstruction, stability of the glenohumeral joint as well as some supination function of the forearm can be restored to a varying degree at the same time.
Depending on the level of brachial plexus lesion and/or reinnervation, different reconstructive procedures are available.
In order to select the best treatment option for the patient it is necessary to known the extent of the lesion of the brachial plexus and/or ventral upper arm muscles, to time the operation appropriately, to be aware of all treatment possibilities and to recall the special problems of tendon transfer for brachial plexus patients.
Our concept is based on our experience with more than 1100 patients presenting a brachial plexus lesion between 1981 and 1996 and treated in our institution.
There were 528 operative revisions of the brachial plexus.
Some 225 patients underwent secondary muscle/tendon transfers.
In 35 patients elbow flexion was reconstructed by bipolar latissimus dorsi transfer (n = 10), triceps-to-biceps transfer (n = 15), modified flexor/pronator muscle mass proximalization (n = 6) and multiple-stage free functional muscle transfer after intercostal nerve transfer (n = 4).
The official German guidelines for prevention of intravascular-device-associated infections were published by the Bundesgesundheitsamt, now called the Robert-Koch-Institut, 12 years ago.
The recently published official "Guidelines for Prevention of Intravascular-Device Associated Infections" of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) are categorized according to scientific evidence.
The American guidelines are very detailed and differ in some aspects from the offical German guidelines.
The purpose of the present paper is to inform the German-speaking anaesthesiologist about the official CDC guidelines and to provide an update on the prevention of intravascular-device-associated infections.
We assessed the interindividual diagnostic variance of 39 experienced arthroscopists by the Kappa Cohen interobserver variation analysis using videotapes of eight different patients with different diagnoses.
Arthroscopically normal findings showed a relatively acceptable interobserver correlation.
Pathological changes, in contrast, often showed very little correlation, especially in the synovial membrane of the suprapatellar recess, in the cartilage of the femoropatellar groove and the posterior cruciate ligament.
In patellar alignment there was also great interobserver variation.
Clinical relevance: When comparing arthroscopic findings with other imaging techniques the above results should be taken into account.
Furthermore, these results will affect the significance of medical expertise based only on pictures.
In addition, medical cost billing, which is based on arthroscopic findings, has to take into account that a wrong diagnosis is possible and therefore charges will be wrong.
Squamous metaplasia can be demonstrated in about 4% of all invasive carcinomas of the breast.
Primary squamous cell carcinomas of the breast are rare, since they occur in less than 1% of all primary invasive breast carcinomas.
In order to classify a breast tumor as a primary squamous cell carcinoma one must exclude an epidermal origin, especially from the nipple region and the possibility of metastatic infiltration of the breast by a squamous cell carcnoma from a different location.
Causative and formal pathogenesis of primary squamous cell carcinoma of the breast is not clear.
A pluripotent embryonal stem cell origin is discussed, considering the phylogenetic descent of the mammary gland from skin appendages.
Squamous metaplasia is also suggested to be a precursor of squamous cell carcinoma.
Here endocrine stimulation and chronic inflammation may both play an inductive role.
The number of published cases of squamous cell carcinomas developing years and decades after implantation of silicon prostheses has increased in recent years.
These tumors probably develop on top of squamous metaplasia induced by the inflammatory pseudocapsule.
The limited success of thrombolytic therapy and the high percentage of patients who have to be excluded from lysis has resulted in the alternative application of primary PTCA in acute myocardial infarction.
Randomized studies so far available have shown a significant decrease of hospital mortality by primary PTCA as compared to thrombolysis.
Adjuvant stent implantation and a wider administration of glycoprotein IIA/IIIB inhibitors may further reduce mortality.
For logistic and financial reasons however, not all patients with acute myocardial infarction can benefit from this therapeutic approach in spite of the high density of health care in Germany.
Primary PTCA in acute myocardial infarction should be left to experienced centres and investigators.
Of utmost importance is a reduction of the present "onset-to-opening" times by information campaigns, an improved triage, use of transportation times for pre-hospital lysis and improved thrombolytic agents.
Some 245,000 sporting accidents occur yearly in Switzerland.
The social accident costs amount to approximately 1.8 billion francs per year.
Every second sporting accident occurs during a ball game.
For the shown sporting activities, distortion is the most common type of injury among adults and contained fractures are most common in children.
As is to be expected, the number of accidents has grown along with the exploding popularity of snowboarding and in-line skating.
These new sporting activities show no unknown injury patterns which would demand new treatment methods.
Abstract:  The combination of magnetoencephalography (MEG) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) allows the localization and functional characterization of the somatosensory and motor cortex.
However, this method is technically pretentious and time consuming.
Therefore, functional imaging is still not established as routine procedure in neurosurgery.
The aim of the presented study was the development of a protocol, which allows the integration of functional MEG data into presurgical planning and intraoperative navigation, as a routine method.
We report on a 15-year-old girl and her relatives with typical features of Ehlers-Danlos syndrome type VIII.
Main symptoms of this disorder are fragile skin, easy bruisability, joint hypermobility, features suggesting premature aging, and periodontal disease with early loss of teeth.
The inheritance of this type of Ehlers-Danlos syndrome is autosomal dominant.
The biochemical and genetic defects have not yet been elucidated.
The acute liver failure (ALF) is a complex syndrome resulting from loss of synthetic and metabolic functions of the liver.
Despite recent advances in intensive care medicine patients with severe ALF have a very high mortality and the orthotopic liver transplantation still remains the only proven effective treatment of ALF.
Numerous attempts have been made to improve survival by using various extracorporeal support techniques, but none of these therapeutic approaches was able to increase the survival rate.
Liver support systems based on detoxification procedures only could not influence the deleterious course of the disease.
It is certain that an ideal liver support system should be capable to fulfil the liver's essential synthetic and metabolic functions as well as detoxification and excretion.
Over the last years the development of hybrid liver assist devices has aimed at replacing these liver functions and therefore might give an advantage over earlier systems based on detoxification techniques only.
This article gives a short review of the various liver support systems and focuses then on the hybrid liver support systems, their construction and the remaining problems after the first clinical applications.
After a latency period of 20 years, in a 39-year-old Austrian citizen of Chinese origin, a surgically removed rectal carcinoma, as well as the neighboring chronic inflammatory rectal mucosa with various degrees of dysplasia and one positive neighboring lymph node, showed helminthiasis in the histopathological examination, convincing us of a link between carcinoma and chronic helminthiasis.
Whereas the etiological context between chronic infection by Schistosoma haematobium and endemic frequent urinary bladder carcinoma is considered a matter of fact, whether of not the incidence of intestinal carcinoma is increased in connection with chronic intestinal schistosomiasis is controversial.
The etiological and pathogenetic link between helminthiasis and carcinoma should be considered in the same way as for other related inflammatory large-bowel diseases.
In the sequence chronic inflammation - severe dysplasia, the formation of carcinoma could possibly occur.
Besides a survey of trematodes parasitology and pathology, the link between rectal carcinoma and Schistosomiasis japonicum is pointed out by means of appropriate literature investigations.
Rupture of the carotid artery wall is a very rare postoperative complication.
Mainly ruptures of vein patches are described in the literature.
This paper reports on a 51-year-old patient with elective endarterectomy of the left internal carotid artery using V-Y technique.
On day 8 after operation, the carotid bulb ruptured.
The suture line was not involved.
The rupture was due to local wall necrosis, as verified by histologic examination.
In an emergency procedure the necrotized tissue was resected and repaired using a Dacron patch.
Postoperatively the patient showed paresis of the left recurrent nerve but fortunately did not suffer any other neurological deficit.
Myocardial stunning (contractile dysfunction in the presence of normalized perfusion) and myocardial hibernation (contractile dysfunction matching reduced perfusion) have represented separate concepts of viable, but dyssynergic myocardium in the past.
However, in vivo experimental and clinical work suggests that repetitive ischemia due to coronary artery disease may induce a gradual transition between stunned and hibernating myocardium.
Myocardial hibernation itself can result from a spectrum of ischemic conditions ranging from impaired myocardial blood flow reserve to frank hypoperfusion.
With increasing severity and duration of ischemia, degeneration of cardiac myocytes, accumulation of glycogen and cell death ensue.
Additonally, there is an increase of extracellular matrix protein content leading to reparative fibrosis, which in turn limits functional recovery.
In the light of these structural features, the available methods for detection of viable myocardium, in particular dobutamine echocardiography and nuclear imaging techniques, offer complementary rather than contradictory information.
Dobutamine echo has satisfactory sensitivity, excellent specificity, and high diagnostic accuracy for the detection of viable dyssynergic myocardium.
While in the past only its predictive accuracy for segmental recovery has been validated, newer data show an improved survival after revascularization if at least four viable dyssynergic left ventricular segments in a 16 segment model can be identified by dobutamine echocardiography.
The complete (low and high dose) dobutamine protocol can elicit several types of contractile responses (sustained improvement in contraction or monophasic response, biphasic response, new wall motion abnormality) which should be interpreted in view of other clinical data including a previous infarction.
The test protocol can be used safely at the end of the first week after myocardial infarction.
If ischemia or viability is documented, revascularization should be performed promptly.
A similar strategy should be followed in the setting of chronic coronary heart disease with left ventricular dysfunction.
Since the structural changes of hibernating myocardium are progressive, time to revascularization is critical.
On the other hand, responsible therapeutic planning requires proof of ischemia or viability before initiating a potentially hazardous revascularization procedure.
The coarctation of the aorta is a congenital narrowing of the aorta in the transitional area between the distal aortic arch and the proximal descending aorta.
The coarctation causes an arterial hypertension of the upper half and an arterial hypotension of the lower half of the body.
The indication for operative repair is given because of the hypertension with strain and possible insufficiency of the heart.
The resection of the narrowed part of the aorta with end-to-end anastomosis or interposition of a prosthesis brings on the risk of a recoarctation.
After a Vosschulte-aortoplasty a recurrent coarctation is rarely seen.
This method, however, brings on a higher risk of the development of an aneurysm.
In the following it is reported about a patient who underwent an operation due to an aneurysm 22 years after a Vosschulte-aortoplasty.
The aging of the Italian population is an emerging public health priority.
In 2025 Italy is expected to have the highest world median age with nearly half of the population over 50 years old.
To avoid an unbearable burden of disease and disability on future generations, we must identify areas for intensive disease and disability prevention programs.
A 14 year old macedonic girl was admitted with recurrent colicky abdominal pain that had lasted for several weeks.
Laboratory check, plain abdominal film and abdominal sonography did not show abnormalitities immediately.
Increasing enzyme parameters though indicated cholestasis.
Endoscopic retrograde choledocho-pancreaticography (ERCP) was performed after abdominal sonography showed a dilatation of the choledochus.
It revealed a common-channel situation (ductus choledochus and pancreaticus) and choledocholithiasis.
Papillotomy and stone-extraction could not remove abdominal pain.
Laparatomy and choledocho-jejunostomy could finally remove the symptoms.
Successful transplantation of autologous chondrocytes for repair of articular cartilage defects requires an undisturbed matrix-synthesis of the transplanted cells.
This, in turn, is dependent on the composition of the synovial fluid (SF) of the respective joint.
We addressed the question whether analysis of a patient's SF can predict the rate of matrix-synthesis of articular cartilage exposed to this SF in vitro.
SF was obtained from 115 patients with disorders of the knee, including gonarthrosis (n = 44), meniscal tears (n = 10), rheumatoid arthritis (n = 53), and reactive arthritides (n = 8).
In the SF, the following parameters were determined: Interleukin-1, IL-6, IL-8, IL-1-RA, TNF, Insulin-like growth-factor I (IGF-I), IGF-II, IGF-binding protein-2 (IGFBP-2), IGFBP-3 as well as total proteinase activity and total collagenase activity.
To assess the effect of SF on the matrix synthesis of articular chondrocytes, bovine cartilage was incubated in the presence of SF, and the rate of proteoglycan synthesis subsequently determined.
In some cases, a monoclonal antibody directed against IGF-I was added.
SF from patients with OA or trauma, respectively, stimulated PG-synthesis of bovine cartilage more markedly than did SF from patients with rheumatic arthritides.
On the average, 60 percent of the SF-induced increase of cartilage matrix synthesis could be titrated out by an anti-IGF-I-AB.
The best predictor for the SF-effects on PG-synthesis of exposed cartilage was the proportion of free IGF-I (r = 0.573, p < 0.001, Spearman rank correlation) followed by the SF-concentrations of IGF-I (with a positive sign), IGFBP-3, IL-1, and TNF (all with a negative sign).
According to our data, IGF-I is the most important anabolic factor in human SF with respect to cartilage PG-synthesis.
The proportion of free IGF-I seems to be of special importance in this regard.
Low SF-levels of free IGF-I could be identified as a possible risk-factor for a sub-optimal protoeglycan synthesis of chondrocytes exposed to this synovial milieu.
The coincidence between panic disorder and depression is a well known phenomenon.
However, only few studies investigated the coincidence of panic disorder with schizophrenia.
This may in part be explained by the fact that both positive and negative symptoms of schizophrenia may mask the clinical symptoms of a panic disorder.
We report on a female patient suffering both from agoraphobia with panic disorder and paranoid schizophrenia according to ICD-10.
The productive psychotic symptoms responded well to treatment with a low dose of zotepine, whereas the panic disorder was effectively treated with a combined therapy with imipramine and cognitive behavioral therapy.
Although it has to be questioned whether the coincidence between panic disorder and schizophrenia reflects two different diagnostic entities, the occurence of symptoms of a panic disorder in schizophrenia deserve further attention because these may be treated efficiently by a specific pharmacotherapy and psychotherapy.
A 54-year-old female patient with a 10-year history of ventriculoperitoneal shunt resulting from communicating hydrocephalus of undetermined aetiology is reported.
Transient gait disturbances and cerebral infarction at the age of 46 did not lead to further insights into the nature of the disease.
After many years with only occasional disturbances, a distinct organic brain syndrome developed.
Thorough examination led to a tentative diagnosis of neurocysticercosis; this was based on the history, liquor diagnosis and cerebral microcalcifications in CT.
Despite the initiation of specific therapy, the patient died of the sequelae of the disease.
At autopsy, characteristic cicatricial residues of mainly basal leptomeningitis were found with collapsed parasitic cysts.
Additional intracerebral mesenchymal-glial reactions were less conspicuous.
Residual ependymitis had caused aqueductal stenosis.
Death was due to cachexia, bronchopneumonia and a lung abscess.
The clinical course and morphology of neurocysticercosis are discussed.
The disease has become rare in our country, but is globally the most important parasitic disease of the central nervous system.
The aim of this retrospective study was to evaluate the incidence, etiology and prognosis of severe connatal anemia in preterm and term children.
All neonates born in the Department of Gynecology and Obstetrics, University of Kiel, were included.
In 18 of 18 367 (0.98 permil) liveborn neonates (birth weight 680-4050 g; 26-41 weeks of gestation), the initial hemoglobin level was below 10 g/dl.
In those children with birth weight below 2500 g the incidence was 6.8 permil.
In 17 of 18 cases the cause of anemia could be clarified.
In five preterm babies (28%) an acute fetofetal transfusion and in three newborns a fetomaternal transfusion was responsible for the onset of anemia.
In two cases there was Rh incompatibility, in two cases placental bleeding, and in another two cases fetal tumour bleeding caused the anemia.
In one fully developed newborn there was severe disseminated intestinal bleeding of unknown cause.
Another child suffered from EBV infection, and one had trisomy 13 with multiple malformations.
Ten children (55%) had to be resuscitated due to hypovolemic shock.
Fifteen children were intubated and ventilated mechanically.
Seven children (39%); (six preterm babies and the newborn with trisomy 13) died between days 1 and 6.
Five of these seven children had to be resuscitated at birth.
Six children (33%) showed evidence of neurologic disease when discharged; five of these were resuscitated previously.
Five children (28%) including three full-term babies were developed normally.
In conclusion, severe anemia with hemoglobin below 10 g/dl is very rare but serious.
It seems necessary to optimize primary resuscitation by immediate transfusion and monitoring of central venous pressure by umbilical vein catheter.
The prognosis can be influenced in a positive way.
Diagnosis of bacterial infection and/or sepsis in critically ill patients is a common problem in intensive care medicine.
White blood count, C-reactive protein (CRP), and the erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR) are often used in the differential diagnosis of infection versus SIRS (systemic inflammatory response syndrome) due to noninfectious causes.
There is a number of non-infectious stimuli to cause leucocytosis and CRP elevation.
In the last 3 years, Procalcitonin (PCT) was determined to be a marker of severe bacterial infection, especially sepsis.
PCT appears to have several advantages; it is of non-hepatic (yet unknown) origin and useful in patients with hepatic insufficiency.
There is no PCT-increase in acute graft-rejection, viral disease, and autoimmune disorders.
Some studys showed a prognostic value of PCT in sepsis due to peritonitis and pancreatitis.
PCT appears to be a new and helpful tool in the diagnosis and treatment of critically ill patients.
Further studies are needed to finally established PCT in the daily management of critically ill patients.
At this time significantly higher costs are the major detraction to daily or frequent measurements.
In this retrospective study, the meniscal status of 45 patients with conservatively treated complete anterior cruciate ligament (ACL) tears is reported.
The ACL injury was initially documented by examination under anesthesia and arthroscopy.
Treatment in all cases consisted of a standard protocol of early rehabilitation and bracing.
The mean follow-up was 8 years.
Twenty-nine (65%) patients showed signs of meniscal pathology at an average of 3 years after the ACL injury during the follow-up period.
Rearthroscopy was performed and showed a higher incidence of medial meniscus tears.
The most common tear of the medial meniscus was the bucket-handle type, followed by the flap tear and the single longitudinal split of the posterior horn.
Secondary reconstruction of the ACL was necessary in 24 patients complaining of the meniscus giving way.
The remaining five patients had rearthroscopy 4 years after the ACL injury and a partial meniscectomy and ACL reconstruction was performed.
Sixteen patients (35% of the overall sample) had no instability complaints or meniscal pathology during the follow-up period, but discontinued their sporting activities.
Results indicate the increasing incidence of meniscal tears during ACL insufficiency.
We recommend that patients with ruptures of the ACL should be investigated for meniscal tears and that early ligament reconstruction of the knee and mensical repair or partial meniscectomy should be considered simultaneously.
Four children, 4 to 10 years old, with chronic uveitis were treated with cyclosporin A (CsA; starting dosage 2 mg/kg per day) and prednisolone.
All children had previously received systemic steroids and/or cytotoxic agents, which resulted either in a poor therapeutic effect or in intolerable side effects.
In one child, suffering from uveitis in combination with juvenile rheumatoid arthritis, a complete reduction of intraocular inflammation was achieved.
In a second child treatment resulted in a marked reduction of inflammatory activity with stabilization of visual function, although a temporary increase in the steroid dosage was necessary at one stage.
In the remaining two cases therapy failed to improve the intraocular inflammation.
During the time of treatment, ranging from 11 to 26 months, no serious side effects were observed.
All patients developed moderate hypertrichosis and one child gingival hyperplasia.
In our <\d> experience, cyclosporin A (CsA) combined with low-dose systemic steroids is useful as a therapeutic alternative to steroids alone and to other immunosuppressive agents in severe cases of chronic uveitis in childhood.
Allergic reactions in tattoos are comparatively rare.
In most cases the reactions are caused by different red pigments.
While in the past these reactions have been ascribed to mercury salts (cinnebar) and cadmium sulphide, now synthetic inorganic azo dyes have also been found to be responsible for such reactions.
A 42-year-old man presented with an allergic reaction in the red parts of his tattoos.
Histologically a chronic granulomatous, partly fibrous inflammation with transfollicular elimination of pigment granules was found.
Spontaneous regression in a part of the inflammatory reaction was observed, simultaneously with depigmentation and scarring of the overlying skin.
The pigment used for tattooing was found to be an aromatic azo derivative.
In addition to a positive cutaneous reaction to the dye, the patient also showed a positive patch test to Napthol AS, used for the coupling of different dyes in the textile industry.
Borrelia burgdorferi specific DNA has been detected by polymerase chain reaction (PCR) in different specimens of patients with Lyme disease (LD).
The aim of the present study is to evaluate PCR-diagnostic of urine specimens regarding rheumatologic diagnosis of Lyme disease.
Urine specimens of 77 patients  (LD, n=34; undifferentiated arthritis (UA), n=25; arthralgia/myalgia (AM), n=18) and 15 controls were investigated.
Flagellin gene  (60 specimens) or OspA-plasmid  (32 specimens) were used as targets.
Sensitivity of the flagellin-nested-PCR was 27%, by OspA-nested-PCR only one positive PCR result was found.
Despite of low sensitivity PCR enabled the correct diagnosis of LD in two patients classified as UA.
Therefore, PCR can give valuable hints in single cases if LD is clinically suspected.
Objective: To assess the clinical efficacy of a chemically standardized willow bark extract in the treatment of osteoarthritis.
Methods: Willow bark extract, in a dose corresponding to 240mg salicin/day, was compared to placebo in a 2-week, double-blind, randomized controlled trial.
The primary outcome measure was the pain dimension of the WOMAC Osteoarthritis Index.
Secondary outcome measures included the stiffness and physical function dimensions of the WOMAC, daily visual analogue scales (VAS) on pain and physical function, and final overall assessment by both patients and investigators.
Results: 78 patients (39 willow bark extract, 39 placebo) participated in the trial.
A statistically significant difference between active treatment and placebo group was observed in the WOMAC pain dimension (d=6.5mm, 95%C.I.=0.2-12.7mm, p=0.047); the WOMAC pain score was reduced by 14% from baseline level after two weeks of active treatment, compared to an increase of 2% in the placebo group.
Patient diary VAS confirmed this result, and likewise the final overall assessments showed superiority of willow bark extract over placebo (patients assessment, p=0.0002; investigators assessment, p=0.0073).
Conclusion: Willow bark extract shows a moderate analgesic effect in osteoarthritis.
Background and methods: The aim of this study was to get more information about the prevalence of chronic pain in different practices of home physicians.
900 patients of five different specialists (general medicine, internal medicine, neurology, orthopaedics, surgery) in the german town Bochum were investigated with a questionnaire about chronic pain.
Chronic pain was defined as a continuous or intermittend pain of longer duration than six months.
Confusion between syncope and epileptic seizures is a common problem in clinical practice.
Recently, new insights into the phenomenology of transient cerebral hypoxia have been gained from video analysis of experimentally induced syncope.
Common elements of syncope include multifocal and generalized myoclonus, tonic body extension, automatisms, vocalizations, eye deviations and hallucinations.
Thus, it is not the presence or absence of these features but their specific character that distinguishes syncope from epileptic seizures.
Other clues for differential diagnosis include precipitating factors, premonitory symptoms and postictal events, such as tongue bites and postictal confusion, which has been identified as the single most powerful factor discriminating syncope from epileptic seizures.
In contrast, incontinence and head injury are common in both conditions.
Investigations such as electroencephalogram, tilt testing and postictal prolactin or creatine kinase levels may aid diagnosis but are never diagnostic in isolation.
In rare cases, hypoxic and epileptic mechanisms may interact within one attack.
In the past two decades increasing research efforts have focused on the molecular biology of the cell.
In the beginning, these research activities were purely academic without any direct clinical relation.
A series of important discoveries, initiated particularly by the unravelling of the genetic code and the discovery of the molecular basis of gene expression and genetics, the subsequent identification of oncogenes and tumor suppressor genes and finally the description of major mechanisms which induce genetic instability in cells, now indicate the way to many new diagnostic and therapeutic strategies.
In surgical oncology, these attempts are yielding the first clinical consequences.
Basic aspects of molecular cell biology as far as they are relevant for surgical oncologists are discussed.
The compartment syndrome (cs) is characterized by an increased tissue pressure in a limited space.
Pathophysiologically, it is a multifactorial disease that is potentially induced by an initial trauma and develops according to the existence of cofactors.
Cofactors are, for instance, the circulation of the patient and the initial treatment of the impending cs.
In particular, the microcirculation is altered with endothelial destruction, development of a capillary leak, protein loss from intravasal space and the development of an interstitial and intracellular third space.
An impaired drainage of the lymphatic and venous system causes a venous infarction.
An arterial infarction results if the tissue pressure exceeds the arteriolar pressure.
An accompanying ischemia reperfusion mechanism increases the trauma load.
In disadvantageous cases, the patients are in danger of developing a multi-organ deficiency syndrome (MODS) by an uncontrolled inflammatory reaction, by intravasal volume loss and by a myonephropathic systemic reaction.
Clinically, the patients suffer a disproportionate amount of pain, followed by neurological signs.
Especially in noncompliant patients, tissue pressure measurement is useful.
Resuscitation of the circulation as well as splitting of casts is important.
In case of a manifest cs, dermatofasciotomy has to be performed as an emergency operation.
Even if cs is diagnosed early and fasciotomy is carried out early, the development of sequellae cannot be avoided in every single case.
The object of this study was to evaluate retrospectively the value of open and arthroscopic procedures at mid-term and long-term follow-up.
During the period from January 1980 to June 1997 we performed 247 open (technique: 134 according to Eden-Hybbinette-Lange, 46 according to Weber, 26 according to Putti-Platt, 41 according to Bankart) and 76 arthroscopic (transglenoidal Morgan technique) shoulder stabilization procedures.
The mean follow-up for techniques was: Eden-Hybbinette-Lange 11.1 years (2.9-16.7 years), Weber 5.2 years (2.1-13.0 years), Putti-Platt 7.2 years (2.2-10.6 years), Bankart 1.6 years (0.5-3.2 years), and Morgan 3.5 years (2.8-5.1 years).
We observed that the classic open Bankart procedure has superior results according to the criteria redislocation, range of motion, sports activity, and arthrosis in comparison with the other open procedures.
The results shows that nonanatomical, reconstructive, open procedures are not up to date.
The open Bankart procedure reconstructs the pathology of the anterior glenoid rim only.
The classic open Bankart procedure seems to be the "gold standard" in open shoulder surgery today.
The high redislocation rate of the arthroscopic procedure warrants a more stringent patient selection in the future.
Background: Our study compared the haemodynamic changes after spinal anaesthesia with 2% lignocaine and 0,5% plain bupivacaine.
Hyperkalemia is a frequent disturbance.
When hyperkalemia is associated with a rapid rise of the serum potassium concentration, the risk of cardiac impairment is greatest.
Usually the cooperative action of several causative factors is required to bring about a hyperkalemia.
Increasing age, diabetes mellitus, disorders of the renin-angiotensin-aldosterone-system, high-dose antibiotics, and immunsuppressive treatments may result in hyperkalemia.
The most important pathogenetic mechanisms are (1) renal insufficiency, (2) hyporeninemic hypoaldeosteronism, (3) tubular disorders, and (4) cellular disorders.
Background: CMV retinitis is the most common opportunistic ocular infection and the main cause of blindness in AIDS patients with a T-helper cell count <= 50/µl.
Cidofovir is a nucleotide analogue with a long half-life time after phosphorylation intracellularly.
It is effective against CMV and can be given intravenously and intravitreally.
The aim was to offer an alternative therapy for CMV retinitis to patients who could not receive standard treatment because of contraindications or refused it.
The efficacy and tolerance of intravitreal injections of cidofovir should be evaluated.
A case of multiple eccrine spiradenomata is reported.
One of the tumours was histopathologically associated with dermal cylindroma, and immunohistochemical studies showed that the cylindroma cells differentiate towards the secreting portion of the eccrine sweat gland.
The relationship among multiple eccrine spiradenomata, dermal cylindroma and multiple trichoepitheliomata is discussed.
In view of the risks of a varicella infection during pregnancy and the more and more observed severe course of infection, varicella infection has to be considered as a serious disease.
The initial antibiotic treatment of bacterial meningoencephalitis has major implications for the course of the disease.
The current spectrum of infectious agents must be considered.
Antibiotics have to reach sufficient concentrations in the blood and cerebrospinal fluid for a bactericidal action to occur at the site of infection.
Frequent problems arising in this condition are: (1) the non-observation of listerial infections, (2) the use of antibiotics not sufficiently active against gram-positive bacteria in pneumococal meningitis, (3) the development of meningitis following the use of ciprofloxacin in respiratory tract infections, (4) the hasty change in antibiotic regimens in focal parenchymal infections during delayed response to therapy, (5) the use of bacteriostatic antibiotics, and (6) the delay in administering sufficient antibiotic therapy during fulminate meningococcal meningitis.
Problems arising from these conditions are illustrated by case reports.
Therapy of rheumatoid arthritis with a combination of several disease-modifying drugs aims towards better control of the disease than achievable by monotherapy.
Based on a broad variety of clinical studies, revealing more or less positive results, several combinations have been suggested:...
The management of 178 patients with liver trauma (132 male, 46 female; mean age 34 years (range 3-88) presenting from January 1979 to August 1996 is reviewed.
There were 165 cases of blunt trauma and 13 cases of penetrating injury.
110 cases were classified as simple injuries (grade I or II) and 68 cases as complex injuries (grade III to V).
The overall mortality was 32 % (57 patients).
The mortality for true hepatic injury was 15.7 %.
None of the patients with penetrating injuries died.
Mortality was inflenced by the type of liver injury and the number of associated injuries.
The postoperative complication rate was 55 %.
The most-frequent postoperative complications related to the hepatic injury were intrahepatic or subcapsular hematoma (12.9 %) and postoperative bleeding (9.6 %).
Intraabdominal abscess formation was seen in 2.8 %.
Operative therapy for liver injuries depends on the grade of the injury.
The majority of liver injuries can be managed by simple techniques, including electrocautery and application of hemostatic agents.
In complex injuries hepatotomy, direct vessel ligation, and debridement of necrotic tissue is the method of choice (Pachter's procedure).
In non-controlled bleeding, perihepatic picking is a standard method.
Aim: The aim of the present study was to investigate knowledge, practices, and opinions on tobacco and oral health among dentists of the Berlin Dental Association using a questionnaire.
Materials and methods: Questions focussed on smoking habits, knowledge about oral malignancies and premalignancies and practical approaches to screening for oral mucosal diseases and other associations of tobacco with oral changes.
The questions related to risk factors and behavioural counselling for patients and associated constraints.
Results: Of a total of 4000 questionnaires sent, 483 were received for evaluation (12.1%).
Of respondents 9.5% were regular smokers.
The median number of oral malignancies observed was 3.
Knowledge about some associations of oral changes such as wound healing was adequate.
A total of 93.1% of respondents would refer patients with oral lesions.
Only 35% take a regular history of both tobacco and alcohol consumption and 26.6% explain the side effects of tobacco.
Some 73.4% believed that the dentist could play a role in anti-tobacco counselling.
Limiting factors were lack of training and of competence in anti-tobacco counselling.
Conclusions: This study shows that there still is a considerable need for improvement of knowledge and for provision with effective anti-tobacco teaching material.
Since most of the respondents thought that the dentist should play a role in anti-tobacco counselling, adequate programmes in Germany should be inititated and followed up.
Background: Last year's pilot study, which examined for the first time a representative group of patients with Chagas disease, showed that in this parasitosis changes in the ocular fundus can be expected in the form of defects of the retinal pigment epithelium.
Examination of more patients in this study should give further information about the character and extent of the alterations found.
The posterior luxation of the shoulder joint is a rarely reported and often not recognized lesion in the clinical workday.
The authors present the first case of a posterior luxation of the shoulder joint in combination with an contralateral anterior shoulder joint fracture dislocation.
In that case the authors stress the importance of an exact clinical and radiology diagnostic and the right way to reduce a posterior luxation of the shoulder joint.
Finally they draw the readers attention to operative steps to prevent a reluxation of the shoulder joint.
Magnetic resonance tomography (MRT) has become the most important method in the workup of infantile cerebral complications after primary sonography.
Cerebral MR examination and image interpretation during the infantile period require extensive knowledge of morphological manifestations, their pathophysiological background, and frequency.
The choice of imaging parameters and image interpretation is demonstrated in infarctions and hemorrhages of the mature and immature brain.
A review of the main differential diagnoses is also given.
The relevance of MR spectroscopy and fetal MRI is discussed.
Currently laparoscopic surgery is limited by several factors.
One of them is the precise handling of optics.
Up to now, in our hospital 52 laparoscopic operations have been done with a voice - controlled robot arm to handle the optics in gallbladder, stomach, large bowel and hernia operations.
The visual field is determined by the surgeon.
In all cases handling of the robot arm was precise and the voice response exact and without technical problems.
Twenty-nine operations were done by one operator as "solo surgeries".
In 20 further cases there was one assistant.
A robot arm can be used successfully without problems by any laparoscopic surgeon in any operating theater.
Urine specimens were collected from 49 persons up to 10 days after abstaining from cannabis use.
Urine samples (n = 135) were investigated for free and conjugated 9-carboxy-11-nor tetrahydrocannabinol (THCCOOH) by LC/MS/MS and for free and glucuronidated tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) and 11-hydroxy-THC (11-OH-THC) by GC/MS prior to and after enzyme hydrolysis.
Concentrations for free and conjugated THCCOOH were measured with reference to 100 mg creatinine/dL urine.
Cannabis use was classified as light, moderate and heavy according to the current literature.
In all groups chosen free and bound THCCOOH was present in urine samples on the day of the last use and on the next day.
Urine samples from occasional and frequent users generally differed in the amount of THCCOOH and THCCOOH glucuronide.
Within 4-6 days the concentrations of free and glucuronidated THCCOOH in urine samples of heavy users decreased to those ranges present in urine samples of moderate and light users.
In frequent users, THC glucuronide and 11-OH-THC glucuronide could be found up to 1 and 3 days after abstinence, respectively.
In light users, neither THC glucuronide nor 11-OH-THC glucuronide was detectable.
The determination of conjugated THC and 11-OH-THC in addition to free and bound THCCOOH is suggested as an aid in assessing the frequency of cannabis use, but is limited to samples obtained within a few days after the last consumption.
The participation of social work in inpatient psychiatric care is generally considered necessary, but there is a lack of empirical studies in this field.
The analyses presented of a systematic documentation of social work interventions in 2038 cases during an 11-year period demonstrate that social workers are mostly involved in the treatment of chronic and previously treated patients.
Interventions in younger patients, most of whom are suffering from psychoses, aim at rehabilitation through activity; in elderly patients with organic or depressive disorders, the major concern is to improve posthospital care; patients with neurotic or personality disorders comprise another group with a chronic course and a relatively poor outcome.
As far as their goals are comparable, social workers and doctors agree on their objectives.
Social workers usually see their own interventions as successful, but patient groups who benefit greatly can be differentiated from groups with poor outcome.
Stiff-man syndrome is a rare disorder of the central nervous system characterized by muscular rigidity and superimposed spasms.
The etiology is still unknown and an autoimmune cause is discussed.
Many differential diagnoses of muscular rigidity and of induration of the skin have to be considered.
A 22 year old patient was admitted under suspicion of a stiff-man syndrome.
He has had developed a painful rigidity of the trunk, starting in the neck.
Massive stiffness of the trunk with pale appearance of the skin and a beginning disorder of swallowing and respiration were observed.
Clinical investigation, EMG, cerebrospinal fluid and laboratory findings were all normal, thus excluding a stiff-man syndrome and other neuromuscular diseases.
Skin biopsy showed typical changes of Buschke's scleredema adultorum, a rare connective tissue disorder of unknown etiology.
Therapy with corticosteroide and ciclosporin led to a mild improvement of symptoms.
Although rare, Buschke's scleredema adultorum should be regarded as a differential diagnosis of the stiff man syndrome.
Urogenital infections are established as hazards to male fertility.
Various pathophysiological hypotheses have evolved from experimental and clinical studies, facilitating explanation of the effects of bacteria and immunological events on reproductive tissues.
Numerous current studies have identified and evaluated infectious mediators accounting for specific molecular events in urogenital infections.
Valuable studies can be expected to appear in the future due to improvements in diagnostic procedures and new classifications of urogenital infections.
X-ray or CT images allow only a limited three-dimensional orientation in presurgical planning.
Especially for the planning of internal hemipelvectomies with custom-made endoprosthesis and for periacetabular osteotomies a high-grade orientation is necessary.
This orientation is improved by a 3D CT-controlled manufactured 1:1 model of the pelvis.
This enables an exact classification of defect and deformity, planning of resection planes, design of the suitable custom-made implant and simulation of the operation technique as preoperative quality control.
An Ivalon-plug (PDA-plug) has been developed for transvenous closure of patent ductus arteriosus.
It can be introduced into the ductus through standard venous sheaths with a diameter von 8-16 French.
The plug is fixed in its target position by means of four distal (aortal) and two proximal (pulmonary) nitinol struts.
In case of malpositioning the system can be pulled back into and retrieved through the sheath.
In animal experiments endothelialization of the implanted material was demonstrated.
PDA-closure was attempted in 58 patients; the procedure was successful in 57 cases; a residual ductal flow was present in eight patients.
During a follow-up of up to 24 months there were no complications.
Using 8 different monoclonal antibodies, immunohistology was performed on 36 follicular adenomas and on 28 follicular, 34 papillary, 27 medullary and 29 anaplastic carcinomas of the thyroid.
The panel of antibodies was directed against broad-spectrum cytokeratins (pan-CK, antibody lu-5), against basic and acid high-molecular-weight CK of types  1, 5, 10 and 14, against basic ( 5 and 6) and acid high-molecular-weight CK ( 13) and against basic ( 7 and  8) and acid low-molecular-weight CK ( 19 and  20).
With the exception of a large number of anaplastic carcinomas, nearly all other tumours exhibited strong immunoreactivity with antibodies against pan-CK, CK 8 and CK 19.
CK 20 expression was exclusively shown for 2 medullary carcinomas.
Reactivity for high-molecular-weight CK could only, each time focally, be demonstrated for 14 papillary and 2 follicular carcinomas and for 2 anaplastic carcinomas with partial squamous differentiation.
Thirteen anaplastic carcinomas were not decorated by any of the CK antibodies applied.
CK 7 staining exceeding the staining of individual cells was observed in 26 papillary cancers.
In contrast, such a finding could only be obtained with each one follicular adenoma, medullary carcinoma and anaplastic carcinoma and with 5 follicular carcinomas.
These results confirm earlier studies in that CK 20 expression among thyroid tumours is restricted to the neuroendocrine medullary carcinomas and that in a larger percentage of anaplastic thyroid carcinomas an epithelial phenotype can not be demonstrated even upon using broad-spectrum CK antibodies.
New is the finding that there exist considerable differences between papillary carcinomas and all other non-papillary thyroid tumours regarding CK 7 expression.
This result might be of differential diagnostic value for the distinction of follicular and papillary thyroid neoplasias which sometimes have an overlapping histological pattern.
Purpose: To compare reading speed and reading comfort between closed-circuit television systems (CCTVs) with different image refresh rates.
This surveillance study presents a literature review concerning the very inhomogeneous care emphasis of the acute psychosocial crisis both with respect to crisis insight and therapy methods and to professional responsibility.
In detail general care models of psychotherapeutic crisis intervention are described, as well as disorder- and event-specific concepts and papers on crisis intervention with children, teen-agers, and adolescents of the last 10 years.
In addition, the contributions of the empirical psychotherapy research and their results are presented as far as they are relevant to crisis intervention.
In recent years many different systems for transcatheter closure of an atrial septal defect (ASD) have been developed and tested.
However, all systems presently available have some special disadvantages.
The recently introduced Amplatzer Septal Occluder (ASO), though, appears promising.
It is a self-expanding and self-centering double disc made from a Nitinol mesh, which is tightly woven to give mechanical strength.
Both discs are separated by a connecting cylindrical portion.
Its diameter may be chosen, so that it corresponds to that of the ASD.
In the light of recent research findings the inappropriateness of many commonly accepted concepts in psychosomatic medicine is discussed.
They do not stand up to empirical scrutiny.
This applies both to sepcifity models and to duality of body and mind or of illness and health.
The monocausal-psychogenetic view was replaced through a complex interplay of hierarchie somato-psychic circles which are to be integrated into a biosemiotic model.
In terms of the self-object-body system a greater significance is attached to affects in the communication and acting receives an important interactive function.
The effects of the altered theroretical positions on new therapy approaches are discussed.
Perioperative, mostly silent ischaemia in patients with coronary heart disease is difficult to detect by clinical examinations.
Herpes simplex viruses are known to be among the most common disease-causing microorganisms.
Their prevalence can exceed 90% depending on the socioeconomic status of the population.
Since the number of immunocompromised patients has increased because of the increased incidence in the acquired immunodeficiency syndrome and an increase in organ transplantation, herpes virus infection may have a greater clinical significance.
While treatment of otherwise healthy individuals will not usually cause any clinical problems herpes infection in an immunocompromised patient can have severe consequences.
Additionally, development of viral resistance can be observed that may require alternative drugs in treatment.
We present a case history of a man with a B-cell chronic lymphocytic leukemia that was associated with a very unusual herpes simplex virus infection in the nasal vestibule.
Possible causes for the development of resistance in herpes infections and the use of famciclovir and forscarnet as two therapeutic alternatives to aciclovir are discussed.
Tumor invasion of the portal vein by ductal adenocarcinoma of the pancreatic head is classically known as a criterion for inoperability.
Despite improvement in operation techniques for portal vein resection during Whipple's procedure and acceptable mortality and morbidity, in the case of uncertain tumor infiltration vascular resection cannot be recommended in general.
The problem is the preoperative detection of tumor infiltration of the portal vein.
Often the surgeon is confronted with unsuspected macroscopic portal vein infiltration or tumor adhesion during the operation.
Between 1986 and 1995 105 patients underwent Whipple's procedure for ductal adenocarcinoma of the pancreatic head in our department.
In eight of these cases partial portal vein resection was performed because of macroscopic tumor infiltration or tumor adhesion.
In all eight cases the preoperative diagnostic procedures with CT and portography did not show any suspicion of tumor infiltration.
In four of the eight cases histological tumor infiltration of all vascular layers was found.
In the others we found no or only adventitial tumor invasion.
The patients without tumor infiltration of the portal vein showed a survival time after surgery of 27.78 months in contrast to 6.67 months in the group with histologically proven tumor infiltration.
Endovascular, intraportal ultrasound (IPEUS), a new diagnostic procedure, can give helpful information regarding portal vein involvement.
Although the IPEUS is not a standard diagnostic procedure it was shown to detect portal vein infiltration with high sensitivity and specificity.
Our results indicate that in such cases where portal vein infiltration has been excluded by IPEUS, patients with macroscopic tumor adhesion do benefit from partial portal vein resection.
Progression in medical research and economic needs require new planning and organization of treatment strategies.
This does also apply for stroke treatment: New pathophysiological knowledge, positive results of thrombolytic therapy and the demostrated importance of early treatment at Stroke Units justify that stroke must be regarded as an emergency.
Timing is of utmost importance.
Time-based management serves as a planning model for a new stroke treatment strategy.
The treatment process is divided into three phases: alarming, pre-hospital and in-hospital phase.
The effectiveness of each of these phases is influenced by several variables (personnel, technical equipment, course of the disease, etc.).
Knowledge of each separate phase helps to discover weaknesses, which allows an aimed improvement, e.g.
public education, training of paramedics and medical personnel.
Modern communication systems allow new information transfer, which can help to avoid unnecessary transport of patients.
Prosthetic valve endocarditis (PVE) is a severe complication after heart valve replacement.
Incidence ranges in literature between 0.1% and 2.3% (mean 0.4%) per patient year (pty).
PVE is classified as "early" or "late" (occurence within or after 60 days following heart valve replacement).
In this review we present the clinical outcome of PVE as well as the most common diagnostic criteria (Duke criteria), the potential etiologies and the most frequent bacteria.
The spectrum of therapeutical alternatives is discussed and a special attention is directed to the development of prevention standards.
Recently intra-atrial defibrillation has become an interesting alternative to external defibrillation and drug therapy for the treatment of atrial fibrillation.
Low-energy intra-atrial defibrillation can be used to restore sinus rhtyhm f.ex.
after a failed external cardioversion or during an electrophysiologic study when the administration of antiarrhythmic drugs should be avoided.
Additionally this new technique has led to the development of implantable atrial defibrillators for the treatment of selected patients suffering from chronic atrial fibrillation.
Intra-atrial defibrillation seems to be a highly effective and safe method, but little experience exists concerning the outcome so far.
Especially the potential risk of inducing ventricular proarrhythmia is subject of current controversy.
Modern imaging techniques are a substantial part of treatment planning for minimally invasive radiotherapeutic procedures.
The aim is three-dimensional assessment of the target volume and adjacent critical structures.
In this paper, we report on our clinical experience with a precise system for stereotactic image correlation.
Hereby, the advantages of each imaging modality can be combined.
Precise immobilization of the patient is a prerequisite.
The immobilization method has an accuracy of less than 1 mm.
This method was evaluated in a clinical study in which a tumor control rate of 93 % was achieved in patients with brain metastases after stereotactic single high dose radiotherapy.
This indicated the excellent reliability of this treatment planning method.
The integration of functional image information, such as blood flow or activation of cerebral cortical areas, will be evaluated in the future.
Olfactory dysfunction seems to be one of the most frequent symptoms in idiopathic parkinsonian syndrome (IPS).
In contrast to the increasing number of studies providing evidence of the usefulness of olfactory tests in the diagnosis of IPS, clinical assessment of olfactory function is rarely performed.
This may be due to the lack of an easy-to-use,  inexpensive, standardized, and reliable test.
In this study, we administered the newly developed "sniffin' sticks" test to a group of 40 nondemented IPS patients and compared the results with 40 healthy controls matched for age, gender, and smoking habits.
In all three subtests including odor identification, odor detection threshold, and odor discrimination, the control group scored significantly better than the IPS group, yielding a specificity and sensitivity of 90% each.
Our results indicate that olfactory disturbances in IPS can be found at early stages of the disease, appear bilaterally, and do not correlate with the dominant side of parkinsonism.
Therefore, we emphasize that olfactory testing may be a useful tool in the diagnosis of IPS.
Purpose: The goal of this exemplary study was to integrate morphological and functional MRI to establish computer-based, preoperative therapy planning for tumors, instancing cervical carcinoma.
Drug-induced toxic epidermal necrolysis (TEN) is a rare but frequently lethal disease of the skin and mucosa of unknown etiology.
Toxic metabolic and immunologic products in the serum have been discussed as possible causes.
For this reason we have performed plasmapheresis on these patients for many years.
Results regarding survival and healing of the lesions are quite favorable, as exemplified with two patients described here who benefited from the procedure despite their old age.
In order to gain insight into possible disease mechanisms that would explain the beneficial effect of plasmapheresis, we did immunohistochemical studies on these patients before and in one case after the procedure.
In dermis and epidermis, there was a striking increase of macrophages and a relative increase of CD8-positive lymphocytes which might act as cytotoxic effector cells; these findings can be interpreted as the result of an immunological reaction.
An increased staining of lesional epidermis with TNF, as previously noted by other autors, should be interpreted with caution since necrotic cells are involved.
On the basis of the clinical results, the pathogenetic considerations, and in view of the lack of specific treatment modalities, clinical studies concerning plasmapheresis for the treatment of toxic epidermal necrolysis are recommended, particularly since this procedure is widely available and generally well tolerated.
The majority of inflammatory frontal sinus diseases requiring operative intervention can now be managed successfully by endonasal surgery.
In problematic cases, however, optimal exposure of the entire frontal sinus and possibly complete mucous membrane removal combined with sinus obliteration must be achieved.
In these cases, external frontal sinus surgery is indicated.
Impaction of an intramedullary nail during extraction is an unpredictable and delicate situation.
Its problematic nature is unfolded on a report of two cases, one with a Küntscher nail and one with a modern solid titanium nail.
This event is caused by ingrowth of new bone formation into the slot or the dorsal flute respectively.
The new bone formation is a mechanical barrier which effectively forces the distal part of the nail to jam against the cortex.
Both, the slot of the unlocked reamed clover leaf nail and the wider dorsal flute of the solid titanium nail, realize certain therapeutic concepts.
Their factual benefit within the concept of interlocking nailing is doubtful.
Primary intracranial germ cell tumors are rare neurological diseases.
Secreting germ cell tumors that predominantly appear in the pineal region are characterized by elevated levels of -HCG and AFP in CSF.
Adequate diagnostic and therapeutic regimens of these tumors are still under debate.
We present the case of a patient suffering from spinal metastasis of a secreting germ cell tumor with raised levels of -HCG in CSF.
Six years before, a pineocytoma of intermediate differentiation had been diagnosed by stereotaxic biopsy.
This demonstrates the importance of an early detection of a germ cell neoplasm in case of midline-sized brain-tumors by evaluation of -HCG and AFP in CSF and serum.
Today, different therapeutic strategies depending on the histological diagnosis are available and justify a high priority of a surgical tumor biopsy.
However, the value of stereotaxic procedures remains controversial.
Recently published data gave evidence of a definite improved prognosis of secreting CNS germ cell tumors following combined treatment with high-dose polychemotherapy, surgical resection and radiation of the tumor area.
-HCG and AFP may serve as useful markers to enable follow-up of the disease.
In order to get a better data management of complications in orthopedic surgery and in order to get comparable statistics a standardisation of nomenclature and classification of complications is demanded since 1.1.1997.
The Orthopedic University Clinic of Heidelberg started with a register of all early complications of all inpatients.
According to a standardized nomenclature all occured complications the doctors put in the data of complications in a database.
These data were controlled, complemented and classified by members of the quality menagement group.
This guideline consists of five parts: catalogue of diagnoses, general and special definitions, classification and an allocation table of diagnoses to grades of severity.
The internet plays an important role in a growing number of medical applications.
Finding relevant information is not always easy as the amount of available information on the Web is rising quickly.
Even the best Search Engines can only collect links to a fraction of all existing Web pages.
In addition, many of these indexed documents have been changed or deleted.
The vast majority of information on the Web is not searchable with conventional methods.
New search strategies, technologies and standards are combined in Intelligent Search Agents (ISA) and Robots, which can retrieve desired information in a specific approach.
With the availability of modern imaging modalities such as magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), contrast-enhanced computed tomography (CT), and transesophageal echocardiography (TEE), diagnostic options in the evaluation of Marfan patients have been improved profoundly.
The most recent diagnostic advances comprise noninvasive tissue characterization of the aortic wall, immunofluorescence studies or pulse chase analyses of skin and cultured dermal fibroblasts, and molecular analysis at the cDNA/DNA level of the fibrillin-1 gene.
New diagnostic insights have eventually led to revised nosologic criteria for the diagnosis of Marfan syndrome.
The diagnostic reliability as well as the advantage and limitation of these recent diagnostic strategies are discussed: moreover diagnostic concepts for patients with neonatal as well as classic Marfan syndrome are presented and discussed in the context of the clinical management during adolescence, gravidity as well as in the pre- and postoperative patient.
Primary defects of skeletal growth and development can be subdivided into hypoplasias, dysostoses and dysplasias.
Hypoplastic bones are small but otherwise normal.
Generalized skeletal hypoplasias comprise various forms of primordial dwarfism and syndromal disorders including trisomy 21 and Ullrich-Turner syndrome.
Dysostoses are defects of bones as organs resulting from errors of morphogenesis.
Many of them are caused by mutations of single genes in the cascade of morphogenetic gene sequences.
Dysplasias are defects of bone as tissue.
Some of them (e. g. achondroplasia, Jansen type of metaphyseal chondrodysplasia) are caused by defects of signal genes influencing cell division or differentiation.
Others result from gene mutations affecting the cellular production of matrix components.
Examples are collagenopathies such as osteogenesis imperfecta and some spondyloepiphyseal dysplasias.
Finally, disorders such as pycnodysostosis, result from defects of chondro-osseous homeostasis.
The study of skeletal defects helps to unravel the complexity of normal skeletal development.
Human parvovirus B19 causes erythema infectiosum (fifth disease) and aplastic crisis.
In pregnancy, B19 may be transmitted on to the fetus resulting in hydrops fetalis.
B19 is sometimes associated with thrombocytopenia and vasculitis.
In immunocompromised patients, B19 may persist causing chronic infection.
Several methods for detecting B19 virus or specific antibodies are now available.
B19 infection does not usually require therapy.
Efficacy of immunoglobulins in chronic B19 infection has been demonstrated.
In absence of significant symptoms and signs, the diagnosis of pulmonary embolism (PE) remains difficult.
Sensitivity and specifity of laboratory tests, chest X-ray, and ECG on their own is low.
Echocardiography is particularly useful in critically ill patients suspected of having pulmonary emboli and can help identify right ventricular pressure overload.
Venous ultrasonography is useful in patients with suspected PE, but normal results do not rule out PE.
Helical CT with contrast medium can identify pulmonary emboli.
However, if the CT findings are normal in the presence of a high index of clinical suspicion, only larger pulmonary embolism are ruled out, and angiography with the focus on distal pulmonary vasculature should be performed.
The diagnosis of pulmonary embolism should be made by combining clinical assessment, several diagnostic techniques, and finally pulmonary angiography in doubtful cases.
Heparin remains the standard therapy for patients with stable hemodynamics.
Thrombolytic therapy is recommended in hemodynamically compromised patients.
In short-term dose regimes, the thrombolytic agents urokinase, streptokinase, and rt-PA seem to be equally efficient.
So far, however, no study has proven that thrombolytic therapy significantly reduces mortality in pulmonary embolism.
Background: Data on mesopic vision after LASIK are not available to date.
We therefore evaluated mesopic vision in myopic eyes before and after LASIK.
Renal tubular dysgenesis is a rarely recognized condition characterized by oligohydramnios, Potter's sequence and congenital anuria leading to stillbirth or neonatal death from respiratory failure.
It is thought to be inherited in an autosomal recessive manner.
Definitive diagnosis is based on renal histology, revealing the lack of proximal tubule differentiation.
Two additional cases of affected sibs in a family with parental consanguinity are reported.
Lectin and immunohistochemical studies confirmed structural and functional immaturity of the proximal tubule.
Further findings include bilateral renal vein thrombosis.
The clinical and morphological parameters defining this disorder and the possible mechanisms of pathogenesis are discussed.
Articular cartilage has only a small capacity for regneration.
This makes the repair of articular surfaces difficult.
In 1959 Pridie described his method of resurfacing osteoarthritic knee joints.
This operation is still in widespread use today.
Pridie introduced the principle of drilling exposed subchondral bone with the objective of encouraging a fibro-cartilaginous repair.
The newly formed fibrocartilaginous layer that develops over the lesion in osteoarthritis may be enough to decrease patients symptoms.
Bone drilling into the subchondral layer is also effective in promoting healing of osteochondrosis dissecans.
The choice of the treatment should be based on factors such as age of the patient, serverity of symptoms, activity level and functional demands on the joint, site and stage of the lesion.
The drilling operation remains useful in osteoathritis and osteochondrosis dissecans.
Recent immunobiological findings together with advances in biotechnology, ameliorations in clinical trial design, and MRI developments have led to a variety of therapeutical approaches in multiple sclerosis (MS).
However, in contrast to successfully introduced new treatments, a number of therapeutical failures exist as well: despite impressive data from animal models, convincing concepts, and promising phase I/II studies, some investigated drugs and strategies showed no positive effects in clinical trials, or trials had to be terminated because of unexpected side effects.
This article provides an overview of clinical studies that have failed or been abandoned for other reasons.
Tumor necrosis factor (TNF) -antagonists which have led to negative effects in two studies (Lenercept, Infliximab) are discussed in detail.
These results raise critical questions concerning the hypothetical pathogenesis of MS lesions and the value of MRI in the assessment of clinically relevant therapeutic drug effects.
In addition to a description of the immunobiological background, studies on the immunosuppressive agents linomide, deoxyspergualin, sulfasalazine and cladribine, trials for the cytokines interleukin-10 and TGF-2, the studies on remyelination by intravenous immunoglobulins (IVIg), oral tolerance, and extracorporeal photopheresis are discussed.
Isolated pancreatic metastases from renal-cell carcinomas (RCC) are extremely rare.
Only 96 cases of clinically diagnosed renal-cell carcinoma metastatic to the pancreas have been reported in the world literature, and 70 of the patients (including ours) underwent a definitive surgical resection.
In many cases the time between the nephrectomy and diagnosis of metachronous metastases is reported to exceed 10 years.
Therefore, the initial diagnosis may be overlooked when there is a prolonged disease-free interval.
When it does occur simultaneously or metachronously, aggressive surgical resection, when possible, seems to be the most effective treatment for this metastatic lesion.
Surgical resection can provide long-term survival in selected cases.
We present the case of a 69-year-old woman in whom two pancreatic metastases were treated by a left-sided subtotal pancreatectomy with splenectomy, 12 years after radical nephrectomy for a RCC.
The patient simultaneously presented with both a mass in the body of the pancreas and a right-sided colon cancer.
Thus, the diagnosis of pancreatic metastasis of colon cancer was suspected initially.
Both tumors were radically resected, and histological examination revealed two pancreatic metastases from the previous RCC.
In the world literature this report represents the eighth case of multiple pancreatic metastases due to RCC.
It illustrates a rare indication of pancreatic resection because of pancreatic metastasis.
The need for prolonged follow-up of patients is emphasized.
The few reports on surgically treated pancreatic metastases from RCC are reviewed after the presentation of this case.
Delusion is understood to mean intersubjectively disconcerting convictions with a tendency toward subjective certainty that lose their disconcerting character when made the object of psychiatric analysis in the knowledge of their independence from mental disorder.
The perceptions from which delusions arise are dynamically charged according to their role in the structural context.
The realisation pressure that burdens the perceptions and is intensified in psychotic constitutions is a precondition for the delusion.
The failure of derealisation brought about by the psychotic disorganisation of the structure is also a requirement.
Based on a case study, considerations arising out of the initial stages of schizophrenic delusion are extended to other forms of delusion and to the conditions for chronification.
High-dose chemotherapy (HDCT) is a promising treatment for patients with germ cell tumours and a poor prognosis.
The selection of patients who may profit from this intervention is challenging for the urologist, as the indication has to be carefully established.
Exclusion criteria primarily concern impaired organ functions.
Prior to HDCT haematopoietic stem cells are obtained after the administration of conventional-dose chemotherapy plus G- or GM-CSF stimulation.
HDCT consists of a combination of carboplatin, etoposide and ifosfamide or cyclophosphamide.
After HDCT, haematologic monitoring and maximal supportive care are essential.
It is therefore recommended that HDCT only be administered at specialized centres.
Pyoderma gangrenosum develops in most patients between the age of 25 and 54 years.
It usually occurs in otherwise healthy persons or in association with a systemic desease.
Several clinical variants of pyoderma gangrenosum have been described.
Extremely painful ulcerations are characteristic and evolve rapidly.
Malignant pyoderma, the variant described in our case report, is an aggressive variant of ulcerative pyoderma gangrenosum, rapidly progressive and a potentially lethal ulcerative disease.
The diagnosis of pyoderma gangrenosum depends on recognition of the evolving clinical features because histopathologic changes are not specific and characteristically serological or hematological markers of the disease do not exist.
Histopathologic findings, however, always include vasculitis, either in form of the necrotizing cutaneous vasculitis (7), granulomatous (1) or lymphocytic vasculitis (2).
We report on a 36-year-old male patient, who underwent surgery for repair of an aneurysm of the aortic arch.
The aneurysm occurred two months after exacerbation of a malignant variant of pyoderma gangrenosum with nearly lethal exit.
An association of pyoderma gangrenosum with vasculitis has been described previously, but the present report is the first to describe an aortic arch aneurysm which seems to be associated with necrotizing angiitis of the vasa vasorum caused by a pyoderma gangrenosum.
We could demonstrate successful perioperative treatment for prevention of exacerbation of pyoderma gangrenosum with prednisone and clofazimine
Background and purpose: To test the association of cardiac sources of embolism with territorial type brain infarcts.
Defects of the dorsal and ventral ligament complexes of the lumbar spine results to an instability of the functional spinal unit.
For the prognosis of secondary instability due to disko-ligamentous injuries the functional insufficiency of the lasting scars is a larger problem than the primar loss of osseous stability with fast healing tendency.
The main goal of the present biomechanical study in vitro was to demonstrate the different grades of instability in the correlation to progressive disko-ligamentous defects as well as stabilisation through dynamic and static procedures.
With a transpedicular screw-ringband-system the segmental function was preserved and instability was abolished.
After rigid instrumentation with a fixateur intern remained a residual range of motion due to which can result refuse to bending moments without spondylodesis in an implant failure.
CT- or MRI-guided stereotactic procedures should be a standard in a modern neurosurgical unit.
Analysing 71 cases the indications and results of stereotactic neurosurgery are presented.
In 53 patients stereotactic serial biopsies of different intraaxial lesions were performed, in 5 patients a spontaneous haemorrhage of the basal ganglia was removed by lysis with r-tPA.
In 3 patients suffering from hydrocephalus due to diencephalic cysts a cystventricular shunt device was implanted.
In 3 patients an intracerebral abscess was aspirated and drained.
A stereotactic guided craniotomy and excision of small deep-seated lesions was performed in 6 cases.
The accuracy of stereotactic tumour biopsies was 88.7 % in our series, in accordance to other authors.
The stereotactic aspiration and drainage of an intracerebral abscess provides accurate localization and minimal cortical damage and offers the possibility of intracavitary application of antibiotics.
The stereotactic internal shunt implantation seems to be an alternative approach in the treatment of diencephalic cysts due to its minimal invasiveness and low operative risk.
The aspiration of basal ganglia haematomas with insertion of an external drainage allows the lysis of the haematoma with r-tPA or urokinase.
With stereotactic guidance small, deep-seated intraaxial lesions can be well localized and removed.
Radiotherapy of patients with prostate cancer offers an alternative to radical prostatectomy in early stages (T1-T2).
In locally advanced prostate cancer a high dose or combined radiotherapy is more effective than radical surgery with concurrent lower morbidity and mortality.
Recent developments in linear accellerator technique, the progress in dose calculation and planning techniques provide the means to apply higher doses to a given tumor volume while effectively protecting the surrounding normal tissue at the same time.
These improvements may possibly reduce the rate of therapy related side effects or complications significantly.
The combination of external beam radiotherapy and interstitial brachytherapy as well as the combination of hormone therapy and external beam radiotherapy are most likely more effective than percutaneous irradiation alone.
In special cases with a very low risk of recurrent tumor an interstitial permanent brachytherapy alone is indicated.
Future developments (i. e. intensity modulated radiotherapy - IMRT, combined thermo-radiotherapy, proton- or neutrontherapy) may further increase the rate of curative treatments in patients with prostate cancer.
Skin is the second most common site of extranodal lymphoma.
The significance of cutaneous B-cell lymphomas has been underestimated due to the lack of monoclonal antibodies and molecular genetics in former years.
Cutaneous B-cell lymphomas represent a heterogenous group of entities which show variation in histology, immunophenotype and in prognosis.
The most common entities presenting in skin are follicular lymphomas, marginal zone B-cell lymphomas, and diffuse large B-cell lymphomas.
The majority of primary cutaneous B-cell lymphomas have an excellent prognosis.
Whereas in B-cell lymphomas with secondary spread to the skin the clinical course is dependant on the prognosis of the primary lymphoma.
It is evident that primary cutaneous lymphomas are distinct from nodal lymphomas and not extranodal manifestations of their lymph-node-based counterparts.
In the current review the morphologic spectrum of cutaneous B-cell lymphomas comprising primary and secondary cutaneous B-cell lymphomas is discussed according to the WHO classification sheme.
The phencyclidine derivative ketamine is a non-competitive N-methyl-D-aspartate (NMDA) receptor antagonist with the thalamo-neocortical projection system as the primary site of action.
Racemic ketamine consists of the enantiomers S(+)-ketamine and R(-)-ketamine.
Racemic ketamine has never been considered an adequate anaesthetic agent in neurosurgical patients since  it produces regionally specific stimulation of cerebral metabolism (CMRO2) and increases cerebral blood flow (CBF) and intracranial pressure (ICP).
However, recent experiments suggest that both tracemic ketamine and S(+)-ketamine may reduce infarct size in animal models of incomplete cerebral ischaemia and brain injury.
This experimental protective effect appears to be related to decreases in Ca++ influx and maintenance of brain tissue magnesium levels due to NMDA and quisqualate receptor blockade by ketamine.
Studies in dogs have shown that racemic ketamine (2.0 mg/kg) increases CBF in the presence of the cerebral vasodilator N2O.
In contrast, studies in rats without background anaesthesia showed increases in CBF after racemic ketamine (100 mg/kg i.p.).
This suggests that the cerebrovascular effects of racemic ketamine are related to the pre-existing cerebrovascular tone induced by background anaesthetics.
Cerebrovascular CO2 reactivity was maintained regardless of the baseline cerebrovascular resistance.
There are several mechanisms by which racemic ketamine may increase CBF.
It induces dose-dependent respiratory depression with consequent mild hypercapnia in spontaneously ventilating subjects.
This produces vasodilation due to the intact cerebrovascular CO2 reactivity.
Racemic ketamine also induces regional neuroexcitation, which leads to stimulation of cerebral glucose consumption in the limbic, extrapyramidal, auditory, and sensory-motor systems.
This regional neuroexcitation with increased CMRO2 produces increases in CBF that can be blocked by infusion of barbiturates or benzodiazepines.
However, increases in CBF with racemic ketamine (1 mg/kg) may also occur during normocapnia and without changes in CMRO2.
